VOL. II. 1
CONRADE WEICKHOFF
I.
It
was the easiest thing in the world for Rodolph
Steinmyer to become enamored of the fair Bertha,
the only daughter of the Baron Staremberg. It
was not so easy a matter to obtain the approval of
the proud old baron. Rodolph was noble, of
excellent
family; but what is nobility without money?
This was the question with the baron  the
leading
question in every reference which he made to
the pretensions of Rodolph to his daughter's hand.
Would nobility, merely, keep a castle, find
retainers
,
man the walls against the enemy, or even
not to descend too hurriedly  furnish the table
and provide the daily cheer? Manifestly, it could
not; and so the noble lineage of Rodolph
Steinmyer
did not go far toward commending him in
the sight of the sturdy father of his sweetheart. It
rather made against him; as it called for that
consideration
in society, and rendered necessary those
shows of place and pretension, which could never
be expected of one not of high birth; and which,
in the event of Rodolph becoming his son-in-law,
would only have the effect of adding an
encumbrance
of great amount to his own already
encumbered
establishment. The baron was quite as
poor as he was proud; and this probably was, in
all respects, a very proper consideration. It was
necessary that Bertha should re-establish the old
house. The castle wanted repairs; and Bertha's
eyes were looked to, whenever it became a
question
how money should be raised for the purpose.
The castle wanted furniture; and Bertha's lips, it
was thought, might do much toward fitting it up.
Bertha's beauties, in short, were the only treasures
to which the old baron could possibly refer,
whenever
he contemplated any of the many difficult,
but absolutely necessary, expenditures of his
household
.
To throw them away upon a beggar  to
give Bertha to Rodolph, was, therefore, a matter
entirely out of the question. It is true, the baron
knew well enough how fondly the two loved each
other; but what of that? Is the love of a young
girl to be considered, even for a moment, in
opposition
1*
to the cupidity or caprice of her relations?
It would be exceedingly foolish to suppose so.
II.
Bertha thought otherwise. She loved Rodolph
very much; quite as much, indeed, as he loved
her. They seemed formed entirely for each other;
and never were two young, thoughtless hearts, so
mutually devoted. Day after day did their eyes
meet, and their thoughts mingle; and day after
day increased their mutual dependence with their
passion. It is true, Rodolph was poor, but Bertha
never thought of that. His garments were none
of the best, but they were worn by Rodolph. His
castle was old, unfurnished, untenanted, and he
had no cattle. But then, she never felt any wants
when with Rodolph, and she never thought of any
want but himself, when he was absent. It was
well for her, perhaps, that she had a papa who was
more thoughtful. The baron's consideration
amply
atoned for the daughter's thoughtlessness. If
she thought only of Rodolph  he thought
nothing
of Rodolph. If she thought nothing of the
possessions of her lover  the old baron
considered
nothing else. Between the two, therefore,
the subject, on all sides, was amply investigated.
III.
It was not the good fortune of Bertha to know
any thing of her father's concern in this matter,
until long after he had gravely considered it. But
one day there came a new wooer to the castle of
Staremberg. This was a bachelor baron, whom
Bertha had never seen before, and who dwelt in
a noble palace at some little distance. She, poor
girl, never dreamed of the object of his visit; but
Rodolph was a little more suspicious. He no
sooner heard of it than he set off, post haste, for
Staremberg
castle. He came in a desperate hurry,
determined to put his
affaire du cur
to a final
issue. His manner indicated no little excitement.
He thrust aside, one after another, the sluggish
retainers, in a most unaccustomed and most
unbecoming
manner; and even the bachelor baron,
himself, Baron Brickelewacksikow,  whose name
the reader will please remember in future, without
requiring us to write it  happening to stand bolt
upright in the very passage through which the
youth was pushing his headlong way, was tumbled
incontinently against the wall, much to the
detriment
of his knees and shoulders, and the
discomfiture
of his spirit. Rodolph was evidently in a
hurry.
IV.
In the presence of the Baron and Baroness
Staremberg
,
Bertha very judiciously being absent,
the youthful Rodolph found himself much sooner
than he expected. He certainly felt, as he looked
upon their distinct faces, that he need not have
been in such an exceeding hurry. The old baron
looked quite as grim as the Saracen that his
grandfather
slew in the fifth crusade, the reeking head
of whom was painted in gigantic lines upon the
trembling tapestry before them; the baroness, if
possible, more outrageously grim, and not a whit
less unhandsome than her liege lord, sat like a
stone fortress of exceeding strength and
dimensions
,
upright in his way. She looked
impenetrable
as a dozen dungeons. Rodolph was no
longer in a hurry. He really began to wonder
what he had come for; he certainly had not the
gift of languages at that moment, and would  if
he had known any thing about that burning and
shining light, at this early period  have given
the world for only half an hour's preliminary
conversation
with the Reverend Edward Irving.
V.
The conference was sooner ended than began.
It was a desperate necessity; and, with a violent
effort, Rodolph contrived to find his parts of speech,
though he still stammered and stuttered most
annoyingly
.
But when he had said his say, and the
obtuse senses of his two arbiters had at length
appreciated
his object, there was a joint burst of
astonishment
,
almost amounting to horror, from
their several lips, at the atrocious insolence of his
demand:
What! do you, Rodolph Steinmyer, dare to
ask of me in marriage the hand of lady Bertha of
Staremberg? exclaimed the baron.
My
daughter! shrieked the baroness, in a
fit of holy horror.
Presumption! exclaimed the baron.
Blasphemy! groaned the baroness. And
they looked to one another, and they looked to
the confounded youth, and they looked to the
heavens and to the earth, and then they turned
simultaneously again upon the pleader, and
demanded
to know if they had heard him rightly.
They were willing to believe that they might have
misunderstood him.
VI.
But the youth had plucked up courage during
the brief and sudden progress of their indignation.
With an air of greater resolution than before, he
repeated his demand; and was just about to give
sundry good reasons why he should be considered
the properest person in the world to take charge
of a maiden so young and interesting as Bertha of
Staremberg, when the baron, with more coolness
and composure  perhaps, too, with something
more of condescension in his manner  proceeded
to interrupt him:
Say no more, Rodolph; say no more. You
are a good youth, and I knew your father. He
was my most intimate friend, and I loved him very
much  very much, Rodolph. I love you too,
Rodolph; you are a good youth, but you cannot
have Bertha.
No; you cannot have
my
daughter, cried the
old lady.
No; you cannot have our daughter, said the
baron.
I am shocked, said the baroness, that you
ever thought that you could have
my
daughter.
It is, indeed, very surprising, Rodolph, that
you should have fallen into such an error, said
the baron; but now that I have explained it, I
trust that you will give up such a foolish, such an
extravagant idea.
Such an audacious  such an impious idea
my
daughter! exclaimed Lady Staremberg, with
an echo to her husband like that of Killarney.
Never! exclaimed the youth, with a voice of
thunder. Never! Give up Bertha? Better
tell me to give up life.
Ay, and that might be advisable, when there's
no money. Life, without money, is but a
baggage
wagon, on a long march, without stores or
provisions, very coolly responded the baron;
Bertha you can never have, unless your castle is
manned, and repaired, and furnished, and you can
show me wealth like that of baron  the baron
with the big name  to whom, if he is pleased to
accept her, I propose to give her hand. Produce
proofs of wealth like his, Rodolph, and, as I loved
your father and love you, I shall give you a
decided
preference.
The youth, muttering curses, hurried away in
despair, bent upon carrying up his appeal to a
gentler, if not a higher court.
VII.
Rodolph flew instantly to Bertha, with a degree
of impatience that might have seemed less than
respectful, but that it was duly mixed up with a
sufficient share of tenderness; he unfolded his
cause of difficulty, related his love at length,
recounted
the scene with her parents, and resolutely
declared that he neither would nor could live
without
her. The poor girl was sufficiently
over-whelmed
with the novel character of her situation.
She had never deliberated much upon the
condition
of her heart, which, like a gipsey's child, had
been allowed all along to do just what it pleased;
and the sudden and unaccustomed contraction of
all its liberties, just now threatened it, had an effect
not less paralyzing on her than it was maddening
to him. She knew not how to consider her
affliction
,
or in which way to turn first. It was now,
for the first time, that Rodolph had declared
himself
;
the words were strangely new to her ears,
but somehow they came naturally enough, and as
a thing of course, to her heart. That heart fully
responded to them; and, certainly, she loved the
youth quite as much as it was possible for her, and
proper for a young maiden of seventeen, to love.
The strength of her attachment to the youth
became
fully evident to herself, when she understood
the intention of her parents to give her to the
baron
with a long name. She confessed how much
she loved him; shed a world of tears; showed by
look, word, and action, that she was miserable at
the thought of marrying another; and when the
youth, flattered with these manifestations, was bold
enough to propose that she should avail herself of
the present opportunity to change the air of her
father's castle for that of his own, which he assured
her was far more likely to be beneficial to her
health, to his great surprise, she flatly refused him.
Bertha was a good child; and the holy law which
teaches us to love father and mother, in order that
our days may be long in the land, was not less a
feeling and an instinct in her heart, than a
principle
in her mind. Her soul was too pure, too
secure
in its natural whiteness, to permit even love
to obtain a triumph over its sense of duty.
VOL. II. 2
VIII.
Rodolph was in despair. Never was lover
more eloquent and impassioned.
And you will not, Bertha?
I dare not, Rodolph.
What! you will consent to this sacrifice. You
will let them bind you to that old dotard, whom
you hate. You will let them tear you from the
arms of the man you profess to love
Whom I do love, Rodolph, was the gentle
chiding.
Oh! Bertha, how can you consent to this?
How can you submit to be made a thing of barter;
of a mercenary love of wealth? Think, my
beloved
,
of the long years before us both  years of
bliss or years of blight, simply as you shall decree
at this moment. Can you hesitate if you love?
Can you hesitate if you think? It cannot be very
long before father and mother will both depart;
and then,  dear Bertha,  where then will be
your consolation? Nowhere, but in the bosom of
a kindred love. You cannot hesitate. You owe
it to me, to yourself, to all; to your promises and
pledges of the past; to your hopes of the future;
to love, to truth; for how can you promise love
to him, having a love for me? how can he believe
it, even should you falsely declare it? It is a
higher duty which you owe to heaven  infinitely
beyond that due to your parents  to speak the
truth always, and more particularly where the
affections
,
our most valuable wealth, are so deeply
interested. Say to me, then, that you will be
mine. Fly with me now. In another hour the
opportunity may be lost, and never return to us
again. In another hour, dearest Bertha, tyranny,
which is the foe to love, may sacrifice us both on
the altar of worldly interest. We shall be torn
apart, and separated for ever.
Rodolph was eloquent, but the maiden was
most firm. To the young mind, taught properly,
there is no consideration so revolting as the
disobedience
of a child; and it must have been the
worst of all parental oppression, that of actual
violence
,
which could have made Bertha of
Staremberg
take any step in opposition to the will of her
father. She sighed and sorrowed unaffectedly;
repeated her vows of love to Rodolph, and
promised
him eternal faith; but the youth was not to
be satisfied after this fashion. He renewed his
solicitations
;
and it was only when he had
exhausted
all his arguments, entreaties, and breath
together
,
that he tore himself away from her
restraining
arms, and rushing forth from the castle of
Staremberg in a fit of despair, hastened furiously
to a neighboring wood, in a paroxysm which
seemed to promise the most desperate results.
IX.
Rodolph sought the wood of the Black Forest
in no enviable temper. He buried himself in its
deepest recesses; for his thoughts were dark like
its own glooms, and horrible, like the numerous
spectral images by which tradition had tenanted
them. He was of a quick and irritable
disposition
;
and he had not been sufficiently tempered
by the vicissitudes of life to bear meekly and
quietly
with any contradiction. The opposition of
Bertha's parents was bad enough; but he had
never anticipated any from herself. That she
should refuse at first was to be expected; but that
she should continue to deny to the last, was no
less unreasonable than unmaidenlike; and with
half a resolution to do what he was about to do,
in her despite, as well as in his own despair, he
drew the long keen hunter's knife from his girdle,
elevated its blade sufficiently in air to make the
descending blow fatal, and in another instant it
would have found its sheath in his heart, when,
just in the nick of time, his arm was arrested by a
grasp from behind. He turned fiercely upon the
unwelcome intruder, and shrank back in horror
from the glance that met his own. Whom did he
see? What did he see? Was it real, or was it
only the spectre of his old comrade, the gallant
Conrade Weickhoff, who was reported to have
perished at sea full three years before?
Conrade Weickhoff! exclaimed the youth,
half in horror, half in inquiry.
Rodolph Steinmyer, was the response of the
stranger, who smiled in the most natural manner
in the world as he pronounced the name.
Are you my friend Conrade? demanded
Rodolph.
More like, than you are to Rodolph
Steinmyer
,
was the reply.
And living?
Did you not feel my grasp? Was it so light
that you have need to ask the question?
Whence came you, Conrade? Where have
you been? They said that you were drowned at
sea; and they have mourned for you as one no
longer of earth.
A wild laugh, and a bright sarcastic twinkle of
2*
the eye, were the only answer which, for the
moment
,
the new comer gave to the rapid inquiries
of the youth. He seemed to chuckle pleasantly
at the idea of being a dead man; and there was
something exceedingly irreverent  so Rodolph
thought  in the manner of his ancient comrade,
while dwelling upon this topic. But Conrade
was always a wild fellow, whom nobody could
manage, and who was reported, indeed, to have
given himself over to studies and practices of
diabolism
.
So general was the opinion among his friends,
that when the news came of his death by sea, the
remark was frequent among them, that the devil
had reason to congratulate himself upon the
acquisition
of a new companion, so much after the
fashion
of his own heart.
X.
The first surprise being over, and Rodolph
being
now satisfied that it was Conrade himself  a
person of very substantial flesh and blood, and no
ghost  that stood before him, the conversation
naturally turned upon the desperate act which
Rodolph had been about to commit, when his
friend so opportunely interrupted him.
What could have persuaded you to this,
Rodolph
?
what motive for this rashness? was the
demand of Conrade.
The youth told his story, and Conrade
chuckled
so heartily that the lover grew indignant.
Why, what the dl do you find in it to laugh
at? he demanded fiercely.
Be not rash, said the other; and, I pray
you, take not your neighbor's name in vain. The
devil may be much nearer to you than you
imagine
.
If I laugh, I mean no offence, you may be
sure. I only laugh at the folly of love, which so
beguiles and misleads men of otherwise very
excellent
understanding. Did you hope to get the
girl by cutting your throat?
Not to get her, surely; but to live without her
would be worse than death.
Perhaps so; but I think not. Life is
comfortable
,
always provided you have enough of it;
and that a man may always have, if he will look
for it where it may be found. But what do you
intend now to do? I have kept you from death
once; when I turn my back, you will whip out
your cold steel again, and try the thing over, and
it may be, another time I shall come a moment or
two too late.
Perhaps, said Rodolph, with some phlegm.
Perhaps is no answer to a friend, said the
other, taking his hand affectionately. Be more
like yourself; let old times begin again. Let us
once more be true friends to each other; for,
believe
me, Rodolph, though time has been between
us, and we have been so long separated, I feel
toward
you as ever.
Rodolph could not reply, but he returned the
gentle squeeze of his friend's hand, and the tears
filled his eyes.
You weep, Rodolph, and I am answered,
said the other. I see you have the same heart
as of old. I, too, have been left unchanged in all
my trials. We are again friends.
They embraced affectionately, and after a little
interval given up to the renewal of former pledges,
after the picturesque and sentimental manner
common
,
even at that early period, among the
German
youth, they again began to discourse about
the purposed deed of Rodolph, and the causes
which had led to it. A few moments were passed
by Conrade in silence; then, abruptly speaking,
he demanded:
And you are required to man your castle,
refit
and repair it, and altogether exhibit resources
such as the baron with a long name?
The youth sighed forth a melancholy
affirmative
.
You shall do it, said the other.
Rodolph looked up angrily, as if he had been
laughed at.
You shall do it.
How?
I will help you to fortune.
You?
Yes  I  Conrade Weickhoff. It shall be
the first proof which I will give you that my
friendship
for you is the same that it ever was. I am able
to do what I promise. I am able to give you the
means to go forth as proudly as your baron with a
long name, and to exhibit wealth even more
extensive
.
We shall satisfy Bertha's parents, and
you shall have the maiden without delay.
Rodolph looked on his friend in silent
wonderment
.
He thought him dreaming. He knew
that Conrade's family had been quite as destitute
as his own. Where could he have got his new
ability to do what he promised. He must surely
be mad, thought Rodolph; but when he looked
at Conrade, never did face seem more confident
and earnest. The expression of his countenance
was conclusive.
Speak out, said Rodolph, impetuously; tell
me all; explain to me the sources of your ability,
and torture me no longer with a hope so
extravagant
as to seem desperate and foolish. Let me
hear upon what you build, that I may know
whether
it be worth while to live for it or not.
It is always worth one's while to live, so long
as there are maidens like Bertha Staremberg to
live with. I know the maiden; she is a heaven
in herself; and were it not, dear Rodolph, for my
friendship, I should certainly seek her love on my
own account.
Ha! said Rodolph, furiously.
But the other checked him in his paroxysm.
Fear nothing, I am not your rival. I will
help you to Bertha; the means are even now in
your own power, and I will disclose them to you.
But come apart with me to some pleasant place,
where we may sit while talking. There is, or
should be, an old abbey in this neighborhood,
where I have often rambled. The grave stone of
an armed knight shall yield us a pleasant seat, and
then we can talk more freely. I hate fatigue;
and standing up when one can sit, is like
submitting
to bondage when one can fly. The sense of
restraint is, of all others, the most hateful to me;
and, when I can help, I will have none of it.
Come.
XI.
They went to a spot more secluded in the forest,
and there they found an old abbey church, which
Rodolph did not remember ever to have seen
before
.
With every spot of it, however, his
companion
seemed familiar; he talked of this family
burial
place and of that, and began to give a long
history of the knight whose crossed legs in
marble
they were then sitting upon, and he might
have gone into details of a thousand years  for
he betrayed a strange familiarity with past events
had not Rodolph, with a more selfish object,
hurriedly interrupted him. Conrade laughed
heartily at the impatience of his companion, and
his pale features were full of a pleasantly satirical
expression, and his eyes danced with a wild, strange
glare, as he looked quizzingly upon the feverish
restlessness of the lover; but he saw that it would
not do to tax the youth's temper too far, and so
he proceeded quietly to his purposed explanation.
You have heard of the late Count Oberfeldt
of Manfrein? he demanded.
The
late
Count Oberfeldt? What! is he
dead? responded Rodolph.
Died last night, was the reply.
Why, he was quite well  I saw him on the
edge of the forest, riding with a stranger, only
two days ago. He must have died suddenly.
Quite  as suddenly as a sharp knife, such as
that you were about to use an hour ago, could
carry him off, hurriedly applied to the carotid.
Murdered?
No; he committed suicide.
Is it possible? He was always a bad man!
remarked Rodolph, quite thoughtlessly and
innocently
.
Ahem! responded the other. Bad or good,
I say not. He was a wild, irregular, strange sort
of person, whose pleasures and pursuits differed
materially from those of the rest of the world. It
is not for us to say whether he was right or wrong
in their adoption. His accountability is not to
us, and so far the subject is foreign to our
discourse
.
You knew him, Rodolph?
The question was answered affirmatively.
You know that his wealth was great?
Yes.
A dozen different castles  fine domains every
where  well provided; retainers in abundance;
good wines and wealth in profusion. These were
his, and, strange to say, though living a
profligate
life, he died having them all in his
possession
.
Stranger still, remarked Rodolph, that,
having them in possession, he should voluntarily
have given them up.
Perhaps not. Satiety is a worse death than
the knife. It is the death of that necessary
provocative
,
without which life must always stagnate.
Wise men pray that they should never have all
their desires satisfied. Oberfeldt was not a wise
man. His desires were narrowed to his animal
propensities, and he was unfortunate enough to
grasp and gain all that he desired. They tired him
out in the end, and grew into a fatigue, so he cut
the carotid, and got rid of them.
The dl has him! said Rodolph, coolly.
That's none of our business, said the other,
warmly; and let me advise you, that to speak
of persons with whom our own acquaintance is
imperfect, is not always to do them justice. You
may discover that truth for yourself in time; for
the present, let us talk of your own affairs, and
then of Oberfeldt's, so far as they may concern
you.
But how can the affairs of Oberfeldt concern
me? I see not that, said Rodolph, impatiently.
But you shall see, when you have heard. The
VOL. II. 3
great wealth of Oberfeldt is to be divided, and you
are, if you desire it, one of his legatees.
If I desire it! exclaimed Rodolph, hastily;
speak out, my friend. Wealth to me is every
thing at this moment; and though I see not why
Oberfeldt should have left me any of his, I am not
unwilling to avail myself of his bequest. I should
not reject one from the dl himself.
You are only too accommodating, said the
other, gravely. But hear. You are one of his
heirs, if you desire it. He was a singular
creature
,
and has made a singular disposition of his
property. He has left it subject to division,
among any dozen men who will pledge themselves
to follow his example
What! cut their throats?
Even so; but after a peculiar plan. He does
not desire them to cut their throats on the instant,
or together. He requires only one amateur at a
time. Once a year, the anniversary of his own
suicide, is to be celebrated by a selection from
among his followers  his college, as he calls them
and the martyr is to be chosen by lot.
Monstrous idea! said Rodolph.
Very! responded the other.
And what then? said Rodolph.
Why, only this, was the reply; I have
determined
to avail myself of all the advantages of
Oberfeldt's will. I will become one of his
devisees
.
I will get one of his fine castles. I will
get his manors and retainers, his stock and his
treasure. I will take all that the bequest bestows.
I am fond of money, for its power and its
purposes
.
I have none of my own. It matters not to
me whether I die by my own hand, the hand of
my enemy, or the worst of all hands, that of
starvation
.
Life is not life, unless for what it yields
us. I do not deprive myself of life, if I lose
nothing
when I perish; and at present I have
nothing
to lose. I go to-night, with others, to
Manfrien
castle. I swear to the performance of all the
conditions exacted by the will; I jump into my
new possessions, and hasten to their enjoyment.
I will begin to live from that hour; heretofore I
have not lived  it is high time that I should. I
counsel you to do likewise. Go with me
to-night
;
swear with me to the conditions; avail
yourself of the wealth they give you, and be happy
while you may.
Great heaven! exclaimed the other: How
can you advise me thus, Conrade? how can you
determine thus yourself? What! pledge myself
to commit suicide?
What were you but just now about to do,
demanded the other, with a sneer, when I came
up so happily, and held back your hand? Is the
present plan worse? Is it not better; far better,
in all respects? You get something now for the
commission of the act, when, before, you could
have derived no advantage from it. You get the
very wealth you wanted; you get the woman you
love, who else would be lost to you for ever. Can
you hesitate?
Rodolph bent down his head. It sank on his
bosom despondingly. The thick drops of
perspiration
stood upon his brow, for a great mental
strife was going on within.
Think, said the tempter, think what you
will gain  wealth, Bertha. Think what you
will lose  Bertha, wealth  all that would be
worth living for.
Rodolph was silent; the other continued:
And she will be the victim, not less than
yourself; the old baron with the long name will
bear her off in triumph. She will be immured in
his castle; her arms will enfold him in their
embraces
;
his coarse lips will riot upon the sweet
innocence
of hers; he
No more  no more, exclaimed the
desperate
youth, tossing his hands toward heaven; I
will go with you to-night; I will swear to the
conditions. Bertha shall be mine, and mine only.
I cannot live without her; I cannot bear that she
should be the bride of another.
XII.
That night the ceremonial was an awful one in
the great hall of Oberfeldt's castle. The body of
the suicide lay in state in the centre of the
apartment
,
which was illuminated with an intense glare,
shooting out from strangely large torches, borne
up by sable figures standing in its many niches
and embrasures. The corpse presented a sight
horried from its wounds, and hellish from it
expression
.
The head had been nearly severed from
the shoulders, by the desperate stroke which the
deceased had given himself. The eyes were
unclosed
;
the lids seemed to have been drawn in
under the brows, and the whites gleamed out with
a meteoric lustre, through the filmy humidity with
which death had wrapped them. The
testamentary
document lay upon the breast of the
deceased
.
His hand, still grasping the fatal knife, with
all the bloody traces of the deed yet upon it,
rested
upon the paper. Around him stood the
persons
who were prepared to avail themselves of the
dreadful advantages of the will before them. Their
3*
number was completed upon the entrance of
Rodolph
and his friend. The lover looked upon
the scene with horror; but he had nerved himself
to the deed. He gazed vacantly upon his
associates
;
and his passing scrutiny did not serve to
reconcile him in any great degree to the step
which he was about to take. With the exception
of his friend Weickhoff, he saw none among the
assembled college before him who had any claim
to gentility. They were either debauchees, or
gamblers, spendthrifts, and wretches who fasten
themselves as a disease upon society, and
contribute
to the corruption of that body upon which
they are engrafted. But he had no time for
reflection
.
Weickhoff led the way, and by his
audacity
evidently controlled the rest. He drew the
document from the grasp of the suicide, and
without
the pause of a second, dashed down his
signature
in bloody characters at the foot of the
conditional
pledge which followed the testament, and
to which its reference was special, and done after
the most approved legal requisitions of those ages.
The example was soon followed by the rest; and
signature after signature appeared upon the fatal
sheet, until Rodolph was the only one left who
had yet to sign. He lingered, and a light touch
of a finger pressed upon his wrist. It went like
a cold wind into the artery beneath. He looked
up in a tremor, and his eyes met those of
Weickhoff
.
What a glance did they encounter! So
bright, so cold; so ironical, yet so conciliating;
such a sneer, yet such a smile. There was a mad
prompter in the heart of the youth at that moment,
and he rushed forward to the body of the dead
man; he clutched the pen in his fingers, and began
writing the letters of his name after the rest. As
he wrote, to his great horror and suprise, the same
letters, as he severally wrote than, appeared one
after the other in a blank space in the body of the
instrument above. A sickness seized upon his
heart; but he desperately proceeded. The deed
was done  the name written  the contract was
completed; and, in the next moment, he felt
himself
clasped in the arms of Weickhoff.
Now, indeed, Rodolph, my friend, you are
mine, was the exclamation of his comrade. What
a strength seemed in the nerves of Weickhoff!
The embrace nearly stifled him; and yet
Weickhoff
was slender in the extreme; pale, even to
wanness; and with a general air of feebleness,
which looked rather like disease than stength or
life. Had Rodolph been asked the question
before
,
he wonld have unhesitatingly said that his
own were infinitely greater than the physical
powers
of Weickhoff; yet now he seemed but an
infant
in his grasp. But Weickhoff had been a
traveller
,
and Rodolph naturally enough concluded
that he had acquired hardihood by trial and
adventure
.
XIII.
Revelry of all sorts, indulgences the most wild,
excesses the most licentious, followed the
conclusion
of the dreadful ceremonial in the castle of
Oberfeldt. A luxurious banquet was prepared,
and every temptation of gross and festering
debauch
,
common to that era, was provided and
partaken of by that melancholy circle of
uncongenial
confederates. The terms of the will were
read to them by Conrade, who took a leading part
in their festivities. But, though of appalling and
curious nature, there was but one of all the
college
that heeded its conditions. That was
Rodolph
.
He listened in a vague sort of
consciousness
.
His feelings and thoughts were too various
and crowded to suffer him to think correctly; and
the emotions with which he felt himself seized, were
rather those of a young, unsophisticated heart,
finding itself, for the first time, in a novel and
strange situation, than of a thinking mind
engaged
in analyzing it. Conrade discovered this, and
plied all his arts, which were neither mean nor
few, in order to dissipate the lover's melancholy.
He succeeded in part. He dwelt with ridicule
upon the passages of the will which seemed most
to have impressed the youth; then adroitly
painting
the happiness which must follow the possession
of the fortune, in giving Bertha to his arms, he
had the satisfaction to discover that, by degrees,
the moody apprehensions of the youth wore
rapidly
away. But still Rodolph could not relish
the associates around him, and with whom he found
himself, by his own act, associated in so strange a
brotherhood. Men he would have been ashamed
to know before, he now found himself connected
with in life and death. That death, too, now that
he was in the possession of the means of life,
seemed to have acquired terrors which it had not
some few hours ago. He had never asked
himself
the difference of situation and mind between
the desperately hopeless man, and him to whom
the world is full of hope and promise. He was
yet to learn this difference. The glozing lips of
the tempter had persuaded him too readily to
believe
that suicide at one moment and at another
was the same thing to the same person, and he had
admitted too readily a proposition so false, as one
entirely true. There are times when it is not
difficult
to part with life  alas! how often is it the
case that we would rather give up heaven itself
than lose it!
XIV.
At a late hour the college separated. The
sitting
was broken up, and the several members
prepared
to retire to the spoils and possessions which
the will of Oberfeldt had assigned then. The
dangers and conditions of that will; the pledges
of terror which they had made  filled as they
were with wine and frolic, and gloating on the vast
wealth placed within their enjoyment  gave them
but little concern. Their next celebration was
required to be held at the same place, on the same
night of the ensuing year. A year was secured
to them of licentious and unrestrained enjoyment;
and to most of them a new world of happiness
was opened upon them by this heretofore unknown
privilege. They gave themselves but little
concern
about the one of their number who must be
chosen for the next year's sacrifice. It was enough
that they had a bond of fate for that period of time.
Reckless in their lives before, they were not less
so in reference to the hour of their death. They
could lose but little, as life had never fairly been
possessed by any among them.
The thoughts of Rodolph troubled him more
greatly on this subject; but the presence of
Conrade
,
who clung to his friend, and employed his
mind and fancy by a continual reference to
Bertha
Staremberg, served to keep them down and
to restrain them. They did not separate as did
the rest.
I will attend you, said Conrade; you must
instantly seek Bertha, or you may be too late.
Your baron with the long name may be in a
hurry
,
and Staremberg has shown you that he does
not hold you of sufficient importance, though he
loved your father so very much, to wait any very
long time for his son. Your retainers, I see, are
ready; and Oberfeldt, like a hospitable man, has
provided handsomely for his friends. These
dresses are very rich. Follow my example.
In an instant Conrade Weickhoff arrayed
himself
in a splendid suit, that lay on the table before
him, which was covered with the richest dresses of
every pattern and size. Without pause for
reflection
,
Rodolph did the same, and they were soon
equipped. In the court below fine horses were
caparisoned; and Weickhoff did not scruple to
single out a noble barb for himself, while
designating
another for his friend. They were soon
mounted, and the morning sun found them scouring
over the space which separated the two castles of
Oberfeldt and Staremberg.
XV.
You should have seen Rodolph Steinmyer and
his friend Conrade Weickhoff, on their fine black
chargers, come prancing into the courtyard of
Staremberg. You should have seen the
consternation
of all the spectators. The baron with the
long name stood aghast; but a moment before he
had been certain of his prey, of which he now felt
exceedingly doubtful. Staremberg looked wild,
but not dissatisfied; while his lady, dazzled by the
guady trappings of the horses and their riders,
could only lift up her skinny hands, and exclaim:
My eyes! my eyes!
To make a long story short, the presence of
Rodolph became very agreeable to the father and
mother, no less than to the daughter. They were
delighted with him, and his horses, and his friends,
and his retainers, and every thing that was his.
There were now no objections to his suit. The
baron
always had loved Rodolph as he had loved his
father. It was only a strange obliquity of
understanding
on the youth's part that kept him from
making the discovery. The old lady had all
along desired that Rodolph should be the choice
of her daughter; it was only a proper feeling of
maternal pride that had prompted her to say the
contrary. It was strange how naturally and well
all old difficulties were smoothed and explained
away; and Rodolph, good youth! only
wondered
at his own dullness, at not having seen things
in their proper light before.
My son, exclaimed the dear old baroness, in
a fit of enthusiastic fondness, the desire of my
heart is now realized; I can go down to the
grave in peace, since
you
are to be the husband of
my
daughter.
Conrade Weickhoff chuckled irreverently and
loud. The baron with the long name
expostulated
;
but Staremberg told him bluntly that he
had never loved his father as he had loved the
father of Rodolph; a speech which the bachelor
knight took in high dudgeon, but without
receiving
any redress for it. That night a wild,
practical
joke which Conrade Weickhoff played oft
upon him, sent him away half dead with affright,
VOL. II. 4
half naked, and at midnight. The wooing went
on smoothly after this; no difficulties stood in the
way, all parties were satisfied, and the marriage
followed as soon as circumstances would permit.
In the arms of the lovely Bertha, Rodolph almost
forgot the dreadful ceremonial which he had
witnessed
,
and of which he had partaken, at the castle
of Oberfeldt.
XVI.
But he was not allowed to forget so readily.
His friend Conrade Weickhoff, like a true friend,
kept him in memory of his honorable
engagements
.
During the honeymoon, however,
Conrade
most strangely kept aloof from the dwelling
of the lovers; and, for that brief period, it may
safely be affirmed that never was dwelling more
favored by the sunshine of happiness. The two,
thus united, seemed only to live for one another;
and such was the warmth and strength of their
mutual attachment, that the most casual or close
observer must have seen that their future joy, if it
depended only upon themselves, must be
unalloyed
and permanent. Alas! it did not
depend
entirely upon themselves. The alloy was
at hand, and the friend of Rodolph, strange to
say, was the first to administer it. A month
had passed, or more, when Conrade suddenly
made his appearanee. Will it be believed, that
Rodolph was pained to see him? So it was. The
presence of his friend brought with it the
recollection
of the dreadful engagement which he had
made, and to which he had seduced him. He
sickened at his sight, and turned away. But his
aversion was not seen by Conrade; at least, the
latter did not seem to see it. He resolutely
approached
,
and took the hand of Rodolph in his
own, and addressed him in the soothing and sweet
language of friendship. But even the tones of his
voice, so soft and pleasant to his ear, and the
words of good faith which Conrade uttered, were
all neutralized by a strange, taunting laugh, a
suppressed chuckle, which his friend of late had
most unaccountably adopted.
Dn that strange laugh which you have,
said Rodolph, abruptly; I do not like it; it
goes like a cold wind into my bones. Where the
dl did you pick it up?
You do not like it, then? said the other, and
he laughed again, more unpleasantly than ever.
Like it, Conrade! How should I? It is the
strangest, most annoying chuckle I ever heard in
my life. Drop it, for my sake, I pray you, and
take up some better habit.
Conrade was obliging enough.
I will try to rid myself of it, said he, since
it annoys you, though the effort will be a hard
one. It is so natural to me.
Natural to you! exclaimed Rodolph; why,
I do not remember to have ever heard it before
you went to sea?
Perhaps not; it is a foreign acquisition, no
doubt, and not the less natural for being so. The
journey through life is chiefly taken that we may
pick up our nature as we go along. Our nature
is not born with us, as foolish people imagine.
We choose it from a variety, as we choose our
dresses; and our happiness depends very much
upon the sort of stuff and color we make choice
of. Perhaps, if you observe closely, you will see
that the most fickle people are those who have a
variety  the most fortunate those who have but
one. It is my error to have chosen some that do
not sit graciously; that laugh, for example, which
you do not like. My smile pleases you better,
I doubt not?
And Conrade, as he spoke, turned his glance
upon the face of Rodolph, with an expression
which was even more annoying to the youth than
the chuckle of which he had complained. He
was about to say so to his companion, but the
fear of being thought querulous, and his own
increasing
consciousness of a state of nervous
excitability
,
determined him to say nothing.
I am feverish, I think, this evening,
Conrade
,
he said to his friend; do you not think
so?
He extended his hand as he spoke; but when
the fingers of Conrade pressed the wrist, it seemed
to him that he was chilled as by an ague. He
withdrew his arm instantly, and looked with
astonishment
upon his comrade, whose smile, like
that of a basilisk, was fixed upon him.
You are disordered, said Conrade, a moment
after, with a show of concern in his countenance.
You should take medicine. I will ride over to
Oberfeldt's castle, and get you something. He
had a fine laboratory, and made his own
chemicals
.
God forbid! exclaimed Rodolph;
Nothing
from that dnable place, in heaven's name.
We will not speak of the absent, responded
the other gravely. But let us to the castle;
some wine will cheer us both, and, possibly, put
you in better health and spirits.
4*
XVII.
Rodolph, dear Rodolph! said Bertha one
day to her husband, standing at the castle
entrance
,
and looking forth upon the retreating
figure of Conrade Weickhoff, who had just left
them; there is something about the baron
Weickhoff
that is very annoying to me. I do not like
him, Rodolph.
He is my friend, Bertha, responded Rodolph,
with a gravity that seemed to rebuke her no less
than his language.
I know it, dear Rodolph, and I try to like
him, because he is your friend; but forgive me,
dear Rodolph, when I tell you that all my efforts
are in vain. I cannot like him; I do not feel at
ease in his presence.
The youth looked curiously upon the blooming
and blushing woman of his heart, and, strange to
say, he loved her the more because she could not
tolerate his friend. He dared not speak out his
feelings and thoughts, however, for there was
between
the two a manifest contradiction which he
had sought, but vainly, to reconcile. In his own
estimation, Conrade had ever been his friend. In
boyhood they were inseparable, and, certainly,
the very possession of his wife and present
happiness
was owing entirely to Conrade. Should
he oppose to these substantial services the
capriciousness
of taste which found fault with a look, a
glance, or a ridiculous chuckle? Nothing could
be more idle or unjust in the eye of reason and
good sense; yet, in his heart, that glance and
chuckle were more than enough to counterbalance
all the substantial services which his friend had
rendered him.
And what is there, dear Bertha, in Conrade
Weickhoff that displeases you?
He is so cold, said she, innocently.
Indeed! exclaimed the other, not altogether
so well pleased with his wife, and rather more
pleased with his friend. Indeed  cold  in
what manner, Bertha?
He seems to have lost all human sensibilities,
was her reply. When he speaks, it is only to
sneer at his neighbors. Does he hear of any
virtues
which they possess, he is sure to know and to
speak of their defects and foibles. He laughs,
too, at sacred things  at age and character
and does not seem to relish the respect which
others show to them. Then that strange, horrid
laugh, which he has; and sometimes, when you
turn suddenly, you catch his eye fixed upon you
with a staring sort of contempt, which puts me,
for all the world, in mind of the Mephistopheles
whom you remember to have seen upon the
tapestry
in the old hall at Staremberg, where he tempts
our ancestor, the Teuton, on the brow of the Harz.
He sometimes frightens me to look at him, and
my blood is chilled when he speaks to me, or
laughs. I cannot like him, I'm afraid.
Nor I, thought Rodolph, but he did not say
it. The words of Bertha saddened him more than
ever, though he loved her the more when he found
how large was the degree of sympathy between
them. A common aversion is not unfrequently
the occasion of a common love.
XVIII.
Your wife does not like me, Rodolph, said
Conrade to the former, one day, some time after
this interview. I am too blunt; I speak out
my mind too freely, and so offend her. She has
been brought up by that old beldam, your
mother-in-law
of Staremberg  forgive me, Rodolph, if
I cannot speak very affectionately of her  and
has imbibed many of those antiquated, stiff notions,
which would fetter all freedom of speech and
intercourse
.
I am a plain man, and can't bend
myself
to conciliate people of his temper. You must
take me as you find me, or not at all. I know I
have my faults; I am neither very amiable nor
very handsome. I have seen the world, and,
thanks to Oberfeldt, I am quite too independent
to find it necessary to play the hypocrite, and give
men credit for qualities which they have not.
Your wife loves not ascetics, and I am too much
of one to please her. Better, therefore, that I
should cease to trouble you with my visits. Now
and then I may look in upon you, and I need not
say how ready I am, with the old feeling, to serve
you whenever you need me. In such case, all that
you need do, is to visit me. I shall always
rejoice
to see one so dear to me.
Rodolph tried to explain for, and to excuse his
wife; an error of judgment, which a wise husband
will never commit.
You mistake Bertha entirely, my dear
Conrade
;
you do her injustice. Her reserve is
natural
to her, and she meets every body as she
meets you.
No, no, Rodolph, I know better. The
difference
is marked between her reception of me and
others.
By heaven, Conrade, but it shall not be so.
You are my friend, and my wife shall treat you as
such.
Strangely contradictory were the thoughts and
feelings of Rodolph on this occasion. Conscious
himself of a changed temper toward his friend, he
sought to hide the alteration from scrutiny by a
show of proper indignation toward his innocent
wife; and he fumed and foamed for ten minutes
in violent speech accordingly.
Nay, be not angry, Rodolph, said his
companion
,
in a style of soothing which was
exceedingly
annoying.
I will be angry, Conrade. I have reason to
be angry. My wife do injustice to my friend! I
will be angry!
A sarcastic smile played over the lips of
Conrade
at this insincere ebullition. Well he knew
that Rodolph's aversion was not less strong than
that of Bertha's; but he took especial care to
conceal his conviction on this subject. Rodolph,
in the mean while, hurried to Bertha's chamber,
leaving Conrade in the hall. He had worked
himself into a petty sort of fury, by repeating
Conrade's language to himself as he went through
the passages, and he was in no small tempest when
he came into her presence. The fury of his first
assault astounded her, and she could not reply,
till, all on a sudden, she beheld the glaring eyes
of Conrade peeping through the opened door of
the apartment. A new emotion  a sudden
strength, which seemed supernatural  possessed
her on the instant. She darted from her seat,
threw herself before the little family altar that
stood by the bedside, and prayed aloud to heaven.
The practical rebuke was felt by her husband.
He sank down before the altar beside her, and
their mutual hands were clasped in prayer. When
she looked round to the door of the apartment,
the face of Conrade Weickhoff was no longer to
be seen.
XIX.
A month had passed before Conrade again
visited Rodolph. In that period a change had
taken place in the dwelling of the latter. Bertha
and her young husband were happier than ever.
She was as women wish to be, who love their
lords. Her heart was light now, like that of a
bird in spring. He, too, though troubled
sometimes
with serious thoughts, was yet conscious
of an intenser satisfaction than his heart had
ever known before. Conrade beheld this at
a glance. His manner was more guarded than
usual. His temper seemed to be subdued. He
was even conciliatory, though reserved; and, in
the flush of her heart's tide of joyful emotions,
Bertha half forgot her old hostility. She even
smiled freely upon, and talked with the ancient
friend of her husband; the whole world, at that
moment, seeming to her young and delighted
spirits, full of associations which were all good
and beautiful.
Conrade congratulated Rodolph upon the
grateful prospect before him, and in a manner
which was far less disagreeable than usual. He
spent the day pleasantly enough with his friend;
but left the castle after sunset, alleging a pressing
necessity for his presence elsewhere. On leaving,
however, he amply made amends to himself for
his own forbearance. His last words, at parting,
left a sting that rankled dreadfully in the bosom
of the youth. The words were simple enough,
and seemed only a passing inquiry.
What month is this, Rodolph? said he, as
it were unconsciously, while mounting his sable
steed.
July, was the stammered reply.
July! Conrade seemed to muse a while;
then speaking as follows, he rode away:
I shall not see you for some time, Rodolph;
not, I think, before November. Then I must see
you, you know.
Big drops stood upon the brow of Rodolph;
he rushed to the gloomiest chamber of his castle,
and he felt not that night the caresses of his wife.
Well did he understand the significant, yet simple
language of his friend. The fifth of November
was the first anniversary after the self-murder of
Oberfeldt.
XX.
It came too rapidly  that dreadful month.
We need not try, we should fail utterly, to describe
the agony of Rodolph, at its approach. It was a
madness  that subdued sort of madness in which,
while the faculties of mind all struggle in
confusion
,
there is still a sufficient consciousness of its
own impotence and utter despair, to restrain it
from any vain and idle ebullition. In a few days
the flesh seemed to have fallen from his bones;
his eyes were lustreless, yet full of a feverish glare,
like those of Weickhoff, and seemed shooting out
from their sockets. His very limbs seemed
palsied
,
and refused their offices. He was incapable
VOL. II. 5
of exertion. All things contributed to this agony
of soul under which he labored. The pregnancy
of Bertha had advanced greatly. A few days,
and he might be a father; and she, as this thought
came to her mind, she clung to her husband with
all the strength of a new-born passion, and,
burying
her head in his bosom, dwelt fondly upon the
blessing which was at hand. How more than
sweet was life at that moment! How dreadful
the idea of death, as an appointed prospect in the
vista of time! How much more dreadful the
strong probability of that death, so near, and so
terrible, which the coming anniversary announced!
Wonder not that he thrust the one most beloved
of all from his arms, when these awful images
assailed him. Wonder not that he rushed away
from her embrace to the deepest cell of his castle,
and threw himself in utter abandonment of soul
upon the cold and clammy pavement.
The night came  a night of exceeding beauty.
Rodolph moved through his dwelling like a blind
man. He tottered in his mental incertitude, not
less than in his body's debility. He was about to
visit his wife in her chamber, when he was
conscious
that some one stood suddenly beside him.
He looked round, and it was Conrade Weickhoff.
The hour is late, Rodolph, said Conrade,
we have little time to spare. Your horse is
saddled in the court. We must keep our
engagements
.
God of heaven! Conrade, exclaimed the
youth, how can you speak of this accursed
business
so coolly?
Why not? I had long since prepared my
mind for it, said the other, and so, I presume,
had you.
No  no!  The thought is dreadful!
Nor will it be less so by poring over it. But
why should this thought be so dreadful to you
now? You are only in the same situation in which
I found you a year ago, even should it fall to your
lot to perish. Then, only for my hand, you would
have done that, the image of which now so
dreadfully
affrights you. I see not the substantial
difference.
But there was a substantial difference, and
Rodolph
saw and felt it. How desolate was he then
how hopeless  how desperate in love and
fortune  with how little to live for! Now
what had he not, in possession, calculated to make
him in love with life  what sweet ties  what
ministering affections  what hopes  what joys,
what desires and delights! He reproached his
friend bitterly, as he thought upon these things.
Would that I had never seen you, Conrade,
he exclaimed, bitterly.
I should have been spared this language,
then, said the other, with a tone of reproach,
which had its effect upon the sensitive mind of the
hearer. Rodolph was too much of a dependant
upon his friend to quarrel with him; and begging
his forgiveness, he inquired into some trifling
particulars
connected with the coming proceedings at
the castle of Oberfeldt.
The chances are no more against you,
Rodolph
,
than against myself and all the rest. It all
depends on fortune. Your good luck has always
been conspicuous; it will not fail you now.
True, true, said the other, musingly, and
with renewed hope; but a moment after, his brow
became clouded again.
But it must come some day or other, Conrade
next year or the next.
Sufficient for the day is the evil thereof.
Death itself must come some day or other, and
with this greater disadvantage, that you have no
specified time for preparation. The Oberfeldt
contract takes nobody by surprise. But the lot
may never fall to you, Rodolph.
How?  it must some day or other.
No! our college is never less. For every
man taken from us by lot, we choose another
member to fill his place, from applicants who are
always sufficiently numerous. The new comer
shares the chances with you precisely as did the
old; and as luck's all, it may be that it shall
never fall to you to perish by your own hand;
and you may die, in a ripe old age, after the
fashion of the most quiet abbot, in all the odor of
sanctity, and with all the comfortings of a full
household around you.
The gamester's hope consoled and strengthened
Rodolph.
I will be ready in a moment, said he.
Where are you going?
But for a moment  I would see Bertha.
Better not; you will only mingle useless
tears.
I must go! said Rodolph, firmly; I must
tell her that I am about to ride forth for an hour
or two, or she will be alarmed.
Conrade chuckled, but did not seek farther to
restrain his friend. The parting between Rodolph
and his wife  he suffering all the agony of his
situation, yet under the necessity of hiding it from
her; and she full of all the tenderness of a wife,
so soon to become a mother  was a trying one
to him, and a sweetly tearful one to her.
5*
God bless you, dear Rodolph, and return
you soon.
He hurried away, and the two friends were
soon mounted upon their fierce and coal-black
steeds. They employed neither whip nor spur,
yet they flew over the space between the two
castles, before Rodolph conceived himself to be
fairly on the road.
XXI.
They arrived late, but still in season. It was
yet half an hour to twelve, and Rodolph had
sufficient time to survey the assembly. What a
motley crew! A full year had passed since he
had seen them, and yet, on most of them, what a
change had that time brought about!
Dissipation
had done its work. Unaccustomed resources
had brought unaccustomed indulgence. The
wallow of the beast had swallowed up the spirit
of the man; and degradation had succeeded to
licentiousness, with the unerring rapidity of an
upward flying spark. Rodolph, who, in the arms
of a faithful and pure wife, had kept, to a certain
extent at least, the original whiteness of his soul,
turned from them in disgust. Their foul and
brutal language frightened as well as disgusted
him. Conrade, on the contrary, whose mental
and moral man was infinitely more flexible,
caroused
and clamored with them most freely after
their own fashion. He did not seem to dislike, but
rather appeared desirous of promoting their
excesses
.
The wine cup was freely plied, and yet
Rodolph could see that, while filling for others,
his friend himself drank nothing. Yet his laugh
that strange laugh  was among the loudest,
and his words had sway over the boisterous group
of turbulents that gathered in a mass around him.
Suddenly, the heavily swinging bell, in the
tower overhead, thundered out the hour. The
heart of Rodolph died away within him. His
bones were chilled  his blood frozen  his knees
tottered feebly beneath the burden of his own
weight. The eyes of Conrade were upon him
his words were in his ears
Rodolph?
Cold sweat stood in massive drops upon the
youth's forehead, and his lips parted feebly in a
vain effort at a hurried prayer. The wild chuckle
of his friend at this moment drove away the
pleading minister at heaven's gates; and
desperately
seizing his arm, Conrade led the way for the
rest into the adjoining hall of state and dreadful
ceremonial.
XXII.
Demoniac, indeed, had been the taste which
fitted
up that apartment. Grotesque images stood
glaring around upon them from the swaying and
swinging tapestry. Sable shafts and columns,
broken and cragged, seemed to glide about the
walls. Gloomy and dark draperies hung over
the doors and windows, fringed with flame-like
edges; and sprinkled drops of blood, like a rain
shower, as they entered the hall of doom, fell upon
their dresses. Rodolph clung to the arm of his
friend, even as an infant in a sudden terror clings
to that of a mother or a nurse. He was almost
lifeless in his accumulating fears and fancies. But
that laugh of Conrade, annoying as it was at every
other period, had now the effect of reassuring him.
It had in it a sort of scorn of all these objects of
dread  so Rodolph thought  which re-nerved
the apprehensive youth; and boldly they walked
forward together. The board of death was spread
the board upon which Oberfeldt had slain
himself
.
The outlines of his bloody form were printed
upon its covering; and there, in an hour more,
his successor was doomed to lie. And who was
that successor? That was the question which
Rodolph propounded momentarily to himself:
Who? who?
There was no long time for deliberation.
Conrade
led the way. There was a strange cry of
assembled voices from a neighboring apartment,
seemingly from cells beneath the stone floor upon
which they stood. It was like laughter, and yet
Rodolph distinguished now and then a shriek in
the dreadful chorus which followed it. Faint notes
of music  the sudden clang of a trumpet  and
then the rapid rushing and the crash of closing
doors, as if a sudden tempest raged without
these were the sounds and images which
accompanied
the act, in which the fraternity now
engaged
,
of drawing for the fatal lot.
Blindly, madly, stupidly, and reeling like a
drunken man, Rodolph, under the guidance of his
friend's arm, approached the table, and the
massive
iron vase, from which the billet was to be taken.
Desperately was his arm thrust forward into its
fatal jaws. His fingers felt about its bottom, and
he drew forth the card. He knew not what he
had drawn; he dared not look upon it. He
believed
his doom to be written.
A signal announced the ceremony to be over
the preparatory ceremony. A bright light played
around the vase, and the several members of the
college advanced with the lots which they had
drawn.
Give yourselves no trouble, my friends,
exclaimed
one, whose voice Rodolph instantly
recognised
to be that of Conrade. You need not
examine your billets, since mine tells me what
yours must be. I have the good fortune to be
chosen successor to our great founder. It is for
me to set you an example in following that of
Oberfeldt. The billet of death has fallen to my
lot. And, as he spoke, he displayed the fearful and
blood-written scroll loftily in the sight of the rest.
XXIII.
Rodolph was speechless with varying emotions.
His own safety; the loss of his friend; the
composure
with which Conrade announced his doom,
and prepared himself for it; all oppressed him
with the strangest sensations. Conrade again
spoke:
I go to prepare. In the adjoining chamber,
agreeable to the directions of Oberfeldt, lies the
knife and the garment which are to prepare me for
his doom. There also are the candidates who
seek to fill my place. From one of these it is for
me to choose. Fear not, my friends, that I shall
choose one unworthy to associate with you. My
pride is, that my successor shall be worthy of me.
With these words he left the hall. He returned
in a few moments, bringing with him another, of
whose face, though Rodolph knew him not, he did
not seem altogether ignorant. Conrade was
robed
for death; and the double-edged knife, with
which Oberfeldt had slain himself, smeared still
with the purple blood of the preceding victim,
was uplifted in his hand.
This is my successor, exclaimed Conrade.
He is named Hans Busacher; you will swear
him upon my body, as you have each of you
sworn upon that of Oberfeldt.
With these words he prepared to mount the
throne of death, when his eyes met those of
Rodolph
,
which were full of irrepressible tears.
He whispered in the youth's ears:
Rodolph, the hour which takes me from life,
gives a double life to you. Busacher tells me
that you are a father. Hurrying by your castle,
the intelligence reached him from a domestic. A
fine son links you now more than ever to Bertha
and to life.
Without waiting for reply, the intrepid Conrade
leaped upon the table. He gave but a single look
and parting nod to the assembly; then, drawing
the keen edge of the knife with a heavy hand over
his throat, his eyes were fixed, a second after, in
the dim haze and utter insensibility of death.
Silence was among the rest, but a heavy groan
burst from Rodolph, drowned, however, in a burst
of shrieks and yells, from the cells below, which
were appalling. But there was little time allowed
for speculation upon these matters. The
uninitiate
now advanced to the table, and each member
crowded round to repeat the terms of the oath to
Hans Busacher which he was required to take.
He did not shrink, though he had gazed upon the
awful event which had just taken place. With
one hand upon the body of Conrade, the fingers
of the other grasped the pen, and signed the
instrument
;
and Rodolph saw, ever as Busacher
wrote, that the name of Conrade faded from the
body of the instrument above, while that of
Busacher
,
letter by letter, rose visibly in its place.
The ceremony over, he rushed from the horrible
connexion, and was soon blessed with the sight of
that dear pledge of love, of which Weickhoff, in
the moment of death, had informed him.
XXIV.
The escape from his present danger was a new
life to Rodolph. In just proportion to his former
extreme apprehensions, was his feeling of security
now. He did not, for the present, trouble himself
with thoughts of the future. There was time
enough, month after month, in the long, sweet year
before him. His thoughts were all due to his wife
and child; to the beautiful boy, in whose infant
lineaments Bertha had already clearly traced out
all the features of the father's face. The days, the
weeks, flew rapidly by in the freshness of so new
and pure a pleasure. Joy vainly spread forth his
witcheries, to delay the feet of time. Months had
now elapsed, and a cloud began to gather upon
the brow of Rodolph, a cloud which even the
caresses of his wife and infant failed at all times
to disperse.
One day Bertha said to her husband  her child
being in her arms, and she being within those of
Rodolph
Dearest, I am sad to see you so. Wherefore
is it? Why are you gloomy? And you groan,
Rodolph, oh, so deeply in your sleep, as if you
VOL. II. 6
had some secret and dreadful sorrow. Tell it me,
Rodolph. Share it with me, dear husband. If
I cannot soothe, I can better assist you to endure
it.
How freely, how joyfully would he have
revealed
to her, if he had dared, the awful secret that
was harrowing up his soul. Better if he had done
so; but he was not sufficiently assured of that
mighty strength which is in the bosom of a woman
who loves devotedly, and he doubted her ability
to bear the horrible recital of what he knew and
dreaded. She implored him in vain; he evaded
and denied, until she grew unhappy, as she saw
that he did evade.
At another time she said:
Dear Rodolph, you do not pray with me now,
as you were wont to do. When we were first
wedded, it was so sweet to kneel with you, and
pray together, each night before we slept, and
confess to each other our mutual errors and
unkindnesses
.
Now, dear Rodolph, I pray alone.
Wherefore is it, Rodolph? Ah, husband, shall we
not again pray together? Shall we not kneel
to-night
,
and renew our former custom?
He looked at her with the desperate fondness of
a dying man  so fondly, so earnestly, so
despairingly
.
He folded his arms around her; he
pressed
his lips long and lovingly to hers; and he
promised her that their prayers should be once
more united.
That evening, when they had sought their
chamber, she proceeded to exact the fulfilment of
his pledge. She led him to the altar, and they
kneeled together, and the pure hearted woman
began to pray aloud. Rodolph was silent, or
strove vainly to utter a corresponding prayer. On
a sudden, he started up with a wild shriek; he
thrust his eyes in his palms, and fled from the
apartment; and that night he came not again to
the expecting arms of his wife. He had seen the
face of Conrade Weickhoff peering from behind
the altar upon him; that horrible grin upon his
lips, and a glare from his eyes that seemed
satanic
.
XXV.
While it was yet early, he had a visit the next
morning from Hans Busacher, who had recently
become a neighbor, and was in possession of the
domains formerly belonging to Conrade
Weickhoff
.
Rodolph trembled and shuddered to behold
him, not only as his neighborhood reminded him
of his friend, but because there was something in
the face of Busacher very much like that of
Conrade
.
There was nothing offensive, however,
either in the person or the manners of the new
visiter
.
He was courteous and affable, seemed to
have always moved in the best society, and, in
every respect, might have been considered a very
model of gentility. There was, perhaps,
something
of loftiness in his air, which some may have
regarded as stiffness, and he was essentially
divested
of all those softer feelings which beguile
humanity with dreams. He was cold in the
extreme
,
if not a phlegmatic. Rodolph and himself
conversed for a good while on indifferent topics,
and the youth, who, wanting in decision of
character
,
himself needed some stronger spirit upon
whom to lean, began to be pleased with his visiter,
and was really grateful to him for having called.
When Busacher was about to go, Rodolph
warmly
made his acknowledgments, and grasping the
hand of the former with a strong gripe, he begged
that he might again soon see him at the castle.
I know not, said the other, with composure,
that I shall soon have that pleasure. This is
July. I go in a few days upon a journey to the
borders, where I have to make some arrangements
in respect to property. I shall return by
November
,
when I shall see you again, of course.
The very language of Conrade a year before.
The visiter was gone; and, during the rest of that
day, unseen by wife or domestics, Rodolph
tottered
,
like a paralytic, through a dark gallery of his
dwelling.
XXVI.
Let us skip over the intervening period.
Nothing
need be said in all this time of the
increasing
mental agony of Rodolph. It will be
sufficient
to know that his despair and suffering were
even greater than during the year before. Life
had grown dearer to him; he was bound to it by
new ties; and Bertha and his child grew lovelier
and more necessary to his heart, with every
increase
of the doubt and the dread which were
gathering
and groping there.
The night came, and, to his surprise, Hans
Busacher
was again his visiter.
I am but now returned from the borders,
were his first words; and knowing that your
course lay with mine to-night, I concluded to stop
in passing, and bear you company.
6*
What an alteration in his voice! said
Rodolph
to himself. I have certainly heard that
voice frequently before.
Thus he mused as he looked upon his visiter,
and he shuddered with the strangest emotions. He
parted from Bertha, suppressing his grief as well
as he could, but full of the most painful
presentiments
.
Come back soon, dear Rodolph, she cried
to him entreatingly, and he promised her, but with
a choking accent.
The companions soon reached Oberfeldt castle,
and, one by one, the several members of the
college
were soon assembled together. Let us not
dwell upon the preparatory display on this
occasion
.
We already know the rites and orgies
which were initial. We have already seen the
decorations of the dismal chamber, and the
dreadful
hall. They were now the same. Rodolph
well remembered each fearful characteristic. The
same scene was renewed in all its parts; and, amid
crowding forms, and stimulated even into madness
by similar objects, sights, and sounds, as had
attended
the proceedings of the previous
anniversary
,
he, with the rest, advanced to the iron vase.
They drew their billets in turn, and when Rodolph
lifted his into the light, the doom of self-murder
was decreed to him in characters of blood.
XXVII.
His head swam  his heart sickened  he
tottered
from the fearful board, and stammering out
his intention to the rest, passed into the adjoining
apartment, where he was to choose his successor,
and prepare for the execution of his doom.
Poor fellow! said one, he does not seem
to like it.
No, said another, but better him than us.
It will always be a year too soon when the time
comes, and so no doubt he thinks it.
Wonder how he likes leaving his wife, said
a third; they say he is very fond of her.
Psha! is she fond of him? is the question.
She will have no loss; she's quite as lovely as
ever, and I will take some pains myself to console
her, said a fourth, who was one of the most
self-complacent of the group. It is in this brutal
fashion that vice presumes to speak of the
superior
virtue which it hates and fears. Little did
the pure minded Bertha at that moment imagine
that such as these were the associates of her
husband
.
Thus had the conversation proceeded for
some time in the hall, when some one remarked
upon the long absence of the victim:
He stays long!
Yes; his choice is difficult. It is to be hoped
he brings us a proper man, a good fellow, not too
proud to know his friends and neighbors.
If he does, said a third, we should rejoice
in the exchange, for he will then give us a more
sociable and better fellow than himself.
The delay of Rodolph to return, at length
provoked
anxiety. He was sought for, and was
nowhere
to be found. The successor was unchosen
the fatal garment unassumed  the knife of
death unappropriated. The unhappy youth dared
not fulfil his pledges. Life was too sweet
death too terrible  and scarcely enjoying the
one, or only destined to enjoy it in horrors, he had
yet fled from the utterly bereaving embraces of
the other. He had availed himself of the few
moments which were allotted to the victim for
solitary preparation, to hurry through a
neighboring
passage, and regain the court-yard. There,
mounting his steed, he had fled with all
desperation
,
and a full half hour had elapsed after his
departure before his flight was discovered.
XXVIII.
There was a general hubbub among the
collegiates
when the discovery was made. All was
confusion and uproar.
The coward! several of them exclaimed,
thus to fly from death.
Dishonorable! cried others, not to meet his
engagements. Some proposed to pursue and
put him to death; and this opinion was about to
be carried, when Hans Busacher, who had, in all
this time, preserved the profoundest silence, now
interposed as follows:
We may not do as you propose, my friends;
we are bound by our contract to a different course.
What says the will of Oberfeldt on this subject?
and how, under his directions, are we to punish a
member who flies from his honorable pledge?
We are not to harm a hair of his head; we are
not to shed a drop of his blood; we are not to
break a limb of his body; we are not to abridge
a portion of his breath; but we are to do all
we are to compel him to the performance of the
deed by a will and act of his own.
How can that be done? was the general
exclamation. They were astounded, for none of
them remembered any such requisitions in the
document.
Does the will say so? was the inquiry of one
and all.
You shall see for yourselves, was the reply.
They read, and, sure enough, there were plainly
written down the fatal requisitions. They were
aghast, and Hans Busacher smiled scornfully as
he beheld their confusion. After a brief pause,
he proceeded:
Our task is not so difficult as you imagine.
Why does Rodolph Steinmyer fly from death?
Because he is in love with life! Why is he in
love with life? Because there are many things
in life which make it worthy of his love. What
do we, then, my friends? Evidently, we are to
deprive him of all those objects which make him
regardless of his honor. Our work begins from
this moment. Come all of you with me into the
private room of council. There let us confer
together
,
on the best plan for bringing our brother
back to the consideration of his duty.
What they did, to what they pledged
themselves
,
and what they designed in that secret
conference
,
may not be said. They separated after
a brief interval; and the shade of Oberfeldt
growled at the passage of the anniversary without
yielding him any additional companion.
XXIX.
Let us follow the flight of the devoted Rodolph.
The poor youth fled madly to his home. In
desperation
,
upon the bosom of his wife he poured
forth the whole dreadful narrative. A silent
horror
seized upon her. She was dumb; she was
stupified with dread. She knew of but one
resource
,
and she called upon God! She implored
her husband to kneel with her before the same
altar, and he did so; but when, like her, he strove
to call upon God, a wild yell arose from the floor
beneath him  a yell of fiendish derision  that
drowned all supplication. At the same moment,
a fierce implacable glare shot out from two eyes
behind the altar, that seemed like dim and baleful
stars, looking forth amidst the gloomy and sudden
gusts of September. Rodolph sank fainting upon
the floor, and Bertha, prostrating herself upon his
body, prayed fervently to heaven for the succor
and the safety of the doomed one!
The night passed  a night of horror. The
day came and passed  a day of increasing
horror
,
as it was one which contributed in a thousand
ways to the hopelessness of Rodolph.
Let us fly, said the devoted wife; let us
fly, my Rodolph, into other countries. We shall
then be beyond the reach of these people. You
can then be at peace, and happy.
He embraced her, and they determined upon
flight. In secrecy he prepared money and jewels
for use in a foreign land. His horses were in
readiness, a faithful retainer intrusted with the
secret only, and every arrangement was made
for a start at midnight. It came, and stealing
forth with his infant son in his arms, and his wife
clinging to his side, Rodolph, when all were
asleep, descended to the porch where the carriage
was in waiting. They entered the vehicle, and
departed; but as they drove through the portals,
they heard voices calling them back, and then a
chuckling laugh, which seemed like that of
Conrade
.
They reached a deep wood, when suddenly
the sky became overcast, and they could no longer
find their way. A storm of lightning came up,
and the horses grew frightened. Strange cries,
as of men in battle, reached their ears from the
distance, and as they drove forward desperately,
the horses sank back in terror from some object
which lay in their way. Provocations like these
had aroused all the courage of Rodolph. He
alighted from the carriage, and approached the
object which had so alarmed the horses. The
distinct outline of a man's body, which seemed
lifeless, lay in the path. A groan reached his
ears. He stooped to the body, to feel if life were
yet in its bosom. The figure stretched up its
arms, as if to embrace him. At that moment, a
sharp flash of lightning showed him the face of
Conrade Weickhoff, the head nearly severed from
the body. He dashed down the bloody carcass;
leaped again into the vehicle; while shrieks of
demoniac laughter seemed to run and gather in
the air, pursuing all around him. With his own
hands, nerved by desperation, he drove the
careering
horses over the carcass, and heedless of the
road, made his way forward.
Whither so fast? cried a strange voice, in
front of him. Would you cross the river in
such a freshet, when the bridge is swept away?
Turn, instantly, or you must perish.
It was a sort of instinct that prompted the next
movement of Rodolph. The horses were wheeled
round, and, driving without an aim, he drove till
daylight. At dawn, the extensive and beautiful
domains of a fine castle lay before him.
Where am I? he demanded of a peasant.
VOL. II. 7
At the castle of Baron Rodolph of Steinmyer,
was the reply.
Rodolph was again at home.
XXX.
There was a destiny in all this. Rodolph
began
to perceive how desperate was the contest
before him. He devoted himself to meditation
upon the means of his escape, and for hours he
was absorbed in thought, to the exclusion of all
outward consciousness. At length he called to
him a faithful adherent:
Claus, he said, you will take the lady
Bertha and her child to Staremberg castle. You
will begone instantly, and put yourself in
readiness
.
He then sought Bertha, and told her his
intention
.
Once secure at Staremberg, Bertha, and you
will not encumber my flight. You can follow me
when you hear of my safety in another land.
Take with you these jewels and this gold. They
will serve us at a future time, and bid defiance to
want.
He opened the caskets as he spoke, but, instead
of gold and jewels, there lay nothing within but a
few rocks in an envelop. That envelop was a
bloody napkin, marked Oberfeldt, and having
on it a purple stain, which gave the idea of a
rudely impressed hand and dagger. The sight
almost blinded the horror-stricken youth. The
doom was gathering around him.
At length Bertha and the child, under the
guardianship of Claus, set forward upon the
journey
to her father's castle of Staremberg. Rodolph
separated from her at the gate with many tears.
When they were gone, he mounted his steed, and
rode away gloomily into the forest. It was late
in the day when he determined to return. He
had meditated his plan thoroughly, and had, at
length, devised a scheme which, he flattered
himself
,
would enable him successfully to fly from his
persecutors. When he reached the edges of the
forest a bright blaze illuminated it, with a light
beyond that of day. He was bewildered by the
conflagration, and hurried forward. When he
had fully emerged from the obscurity of the woods,
he knew the extent of the evil. His fine palace
was in flames. He reached the gates, and found
all his retainers in consternation. The fire was a
mystery; nobody could account for it. While
he gazed upon the blazing ruins, he saw amid the
burning masses, two bright eyes glaring upon his
own. If he had not been well acquainted with
the hateful glare of those eyes, he was yet not
ignorant of the source of that fiendish laugh,
which rose high above the rock when the tottering
walls went down in a final crash. How much
less difficult did it now seem to Rodolph to die!
Suffering had already began to blunt sensibility.
XXXI.
Like an abandoned wretch, he rode over to
Staremberg castle. He could not depart without
seeing Bertha and his child. Their absence had
already half reconciled him to the worst. But
where were they? Neither baron nor baroness had
yet seen their daughter and grandson.
Trifle not with me, I pray you, cried
Rodolph
,
in his agony. Bring me to them. I
am in no mood for sport; I cannot brook delay.
When assured that they had not yet made their
appearance, with a mad yell he rushed away into
the forest. The retainers of Staremberg followed
in pursuit; and the old baron himself, who
tenderly
loved his daughter, did not withhold himself
from the search which was instituted for her. It
was the fortune of the unhappy Rodolph to gain
the first tidings of his beloved. Midway between
his own and Staremberg castle, the carriage lay
overturned, and almost torn to pieces. The horses
were stiff dead, and yet there were no marks or
wounds upon them. They seemed literally to have
been blasted. The dead body of a man lay
stretched out before a portion of the vehicle,
wearing a dress like that of Claus, to whose
custody
Bertha had been intrusted; but what was
the horror of Rodolph, on approaching the body,
to discover the features of his ancient comrade,
Conrade Weickhoff, once again visibly before him.
And the horrible image unclosed its eyes, and
glared upon him, as with a lustful longing, from
beneath the sickly glaze which still overspread the
rapidly decaying orbs.
The fear of death was no longer a fear with
Rodolph Steinmyer. The goods of life were
gone  the things which he had lived for, and
which had made life a province of delight
superseding
the desire in his mind for any other, were
all gone. The wife and the child were torn from
him for ever  murdered, doubtlessly, by the
demon fingers of his foul associates, or the demon
agents of that awful being with whom, it was now
the fear of Rodolph, he had been commercing
7*
but too freely. As he thought on these matters,
however, he congratulated himself that, though
bargaining with the demon, he had sold him
nothing
but his life  he had not traded away his
soul! Rodolph was not so subtle a casuist as the
devil! A yell of derisive laughter rose in the air
around him, the moment that his lips gave
utterance
to the absurdity; and he distinctly beheld the
long, bony, and skinless fingers of Conrade
Weickhoff
stretching up toward him from the carcass.
He rushed away from the dreadful place and
spectacle. Madness seemed to prompt his course,
and desperation gave him wings. But there was
method in his madness. His mind had reached
that stage of frenzy in which nothing can touch
it farther. He was now insensible to hope and
fear, as he was indifferent to life. One met him
in his flight, whom he saw not, but the voice of
Hans Busacher he knew.
We go together, said Hans.
We do! was the reply.
You are waited for! said the former.
Who waits? demanded Rodolph, fiercely.
A finger rested upon his wrist, and the touch
seemed to enfeeble him, while the other briefly
replied
Oberfeldt!  Weickhoff!  Bertha!
Ha! I am ready! was the desperate, but
shuddering response; and they entered together
the gates of Oberfeldt castle, which immediately
closed heavily behind them. There was now no
escape for Rodolph, but he thought not of that.
XXXII.
Shouts received the fugitive  shouts of
laughter
,
of scorn, of encouragement and cheer, rang
in his senses. The members of the college were
all assembled, as if they had been waiting for,
and apprized of his coming. He looked round
the apartment, and noted their several faces. His
emotions were not such as they were when he had
previously met his colleagues. He had now no
fears. His limbs were firm  his muscles rigid
and inflexible  his nerves unshaken. Yet the
pomp of death around him was even more
gloomily
grand than ever. The tapestry, that seemed
made up of gathering shadows, of mighty
spectres
,
and the awfulest forms, appeared to contract
momently around him. Huge torches, borne in
the hands of mute images, waved with a flaring
and smoky light, in dense niches of the apartment.
Faint tones of music, followed by an occasional
shriek of laughter, and sometimes by one of pain,
came to his senses; and more than once, as if
nearer at hand, the plainings of a child seemed to
assail him, as if from his own murdered innocent.
This fancy at once drove him forward to his
purpose
.
I am ready, he exclaimed to the confederates.
Not so, said Busacher; you are to choose
your successor. The candidates await you.
Must I do this? demanded Rodolph,
shrinking
from the task of entailing his own dreadful
doom upon another.
You must! was the reply; and Busacher
led the victim to the chamber in which his
preparations
were to be made. Many were the
candidates
who were there, claiming the privileges of
eternal sorrow, in connexion with a momentary
indulgence. With eyes closed, Rodolph extended
his hands, determined to leave to fate that choice
which he was bent not to make himself. The
person
he touched came forward, and Rodolph, when
he looked upon him, beheld a fair youth, even
younger than himself, in the man he had selected.
He would have amended his choice. He would have
taken one of the degraded and besotted candidates
whom a long familiarity with vice in all its forms had
made callous to all conditions, and utterly hopeless
of the future. But he was not allowed to do so,
nor would the infatuated youth, so chosen, himself
permit of any change. Bitterly, but too late, did
Rodolph deplore his error; but regrets were idle
at such a moment. He robed himself in the
unhallowed
investiture of self-murder. He clutched
the bloody knife in his desperate hand. He led
his youthful successor into the hall of death. He
stood with him before its altar. A dreadful
struggle
was going on within his bosom; for the good
angel of a guardian conscience had not yet
entirely
given up its trust. But, when he beheld the
doubting and the sneering glances of those around
him, and when he thought of the wife and child
whom he had lost, he hesitated no longer.
Fearlessly
he leaped upon the bloody board, and the
knife was uplifted. As he gave the fatal blow, a
shriek, a scream  the voice of a woman in a
deep agony  reached his ears, with the rushing
of feet from an adjoining chamber. He knew the
tones of that voice. They were those of Bertha.
Half conscious only, he strove to raise himself
from the bloody bier, and his eyes were turned in
the direction whence the sounds proceeded. The
tapestry was thrown aside, and his wife  her child
in her arms  her hair flying in the wind  her
movements those of a love bordering upon
madness
rushed toward him where he lay. He
strove, in the agony of death  for the last
sickness
was fast overcoming the life-tide at his heart
to extend his arms to receive her; but, at that
moment, the form of Hans Busacher passed
between
them.
Keep me not back, cried the wretched
woman
,
he is mine  he is my husband.
He is mine! cried Busacher, in a voice like
the falling of a torrent  so deep, so startling
so sudden at the first. The dim eye of Rodolph
gazed up at the intruder, and the form of
Busacher
seemed changed to that of Conrade
Weickhoff
.
There was the same scornful smile upon
his lips, and the ears of the dying man were
conscious
of the same horrible, chuckling laugh,
which had characterized his friend. While he yet
looked in amaze, the figure seemed to grow and
to expand, and he was now aware that the dreadful
personage before him was about to assume another
aspect. While he watched with the last lingering
consciousness of life, and while the breath
flickered
faintly, and was drawn unresistingly toward
the fearful presence which he watched, he beheld
the features change from those of Conrade, into a
yet more dreadful character. Then did he feel,
for the first time, how completely he was the
victim
;
since, in place of him who had been his
friend, he saw, in the moment of his final agony,
the triumphant and stony glare which marks the
glance of the demon Mephistopheles, whose slave
he had become.
LOGOOCHIE;
OR,
THE BRANCH OF SWEET WATER.
A LEGEND OF GEORGIA.
VOL. II. 8
I.
With
the approach of the white settlers, along
the wild but pleasant banks of the St. Mary's
river, in the state of Georgia, the startled deities
of Indian mythology began to meditate their
departure to forests more secure. Tribe after
tribe of the aborigines had already gone, and the
uncouth gods of their idolatry presided, in
numberless
instances, only over their deserted
habitations
.
The savages had carried with them no
guardian divinities  no hallowed household altars
cheering them in their new places of abode, by
the acceptance of their sacrifice, and with the
promise of a moderate winter, or a successful
hunt. In depriving them of the lands descended
to them in trust from their fathers, the whites seem
also to have exiled them from the sweet and
mystic
influences, so aptly associated with the vague
loveliness of forest life, of their many twilight
superstitions. Their new groves, as yet, had no
spells for the huntsman; and the Manneyto of
their ancient sires, failed to appreciate their tribute
offerings, intended to propitiate his regards, or to
disarm his anger. They were indeed outcasts;
and, with a due feeling for their exiled
worshippers
,
the forest-gods themselves determined also
to depart from those long-hallowed sheltering
places in the thick swamps of the Okephanokee,
whence, from immemorial time, they had gone
forth, to cheer or to chide the tawny hunter in
his progress through life. They had served the
fathers faithfully, nor were they satisfied that the
sons should go forth unattended. They had
consecrated
his dwellings, they had stimulated his
courage, they had thrown the pleasant waters
along his path, when his legs failed him in the
chase, and his lips were parched with the
wanderings
of the long day in summer; and though
themselves overcome in the advent of superior
gods, they had, nevertheless, prompted him to the
last, in the protracted struggle which he had
maintained, for so many years, and with such
various successes, against his pale invaders. All
that could be done for the feather-crowned and
wolf-mantled warrior, had been done, by the
divinities
he worshipped. He was overcome, driven
away from his ancient haunts, but he still bowed
in spirit to the altars, holy still to him, though,
haplessly, without adequate power to secure him
in his possessions. They determined not to leave
him unprotected in his new abodes, and gathering,
at the bidding of Satilla, the Mercury of the
southern Indians, the thousand gods of their
worship  the wood-gods and the water-gods
crowded to the flower-island of Okephanokee, to
hear the commands of the Great Manneyto.
II.
All came but Logoochie, and where was he?
he, the Indian mischief-maker  the Puck, the
tricksiest spirit of them all,  he, whose mind,
like his body, a creature of distortion, was yet
gentle in its wildness, and never suffered the
smallest malice to mingle in with its mischief.
The assembly was dull without him  the season
cheerless  the feast wanting in provocative.
The Great Manneyto himself, with whom
Logoochie
was a favourite, looked impatiently on the
approach of every new comer. In vain were all
his inquiries  where is Logoochie? who has
seen Logoochie? The question remained
unanswered
the Great Manneyto unsatisfied.
Anxious
search was instituted in every direction for
the discovery of the truant. They could hear
nothing of him, and all scrutiny proved fruitless.
They knew his vagrant spirit, and felt confident
he was gone upon some mission of mischief; but
they also knew how far beyond any capacity of
theirs to detect, was his to conceal himself, and so,
after the first attempt at search, the labor was
given up in despair. They could get no tidings
of Logoochie.
III.
The conference went on without him, much to
the dissatisfaction of all parties. He was the
spice of the entertainment, the spirit of all frolic;
and though sometimes exceedingly annoying,
even to the Great Manneyto, and never less so
to the rival power of evil, the Opitchi-Manneyto,
yet, as the recognized joker on all hands, no one
found it wise to take offence at his tricks. In
council, he relieved the dull discourse of some
drowsy god, by the sly sarcasm, which, falling
8*
innocuously upon the ears of the victim, was yet
readily comprehended and applied by all the rest.
On the journey, he kept all around him from any
sense of weariness,  and, by the perpetual
practical
application of his humor, always furnished
his companions, whether above or inferior to him
in dignity, with something prime, upon which to
make merry. In short, there was no god like
Logoochie, and he was as much beloved by the
deities, as he was honored by the Indian, who
implored him not to turn aside the arrow which
he sent after the bounding buck, nor to spill the
water out of his scooped leaf as he carried it from
the running rivulet up to his mouth. All these
were tricks of the playful Logoochie, and by a
thousand, such as these, was he known to the
Indians.
IV.
Where, then, was the absentee when his brother
divinities started after the outlawed tribes? Had
he not loved the Indians  had he no sympathy
with his associate gods  and wherefore went he
not upon the sad journey through the many
swamps and the long stretches of sand and forest,
that lay between the Okephanokee, and the
rapidly-gushing
waters of the Chatahoochie, wher
both the aborigines and their rude deities had
now taken up their abodes. Alas! for
Logoochie
!
He loved the wild people, it is true, and
much he delighted in the association of those
having kindred offices with himself; but though
a mimic and a jester, fond of sportive tricks, and
perpetually practising them on all around him, he
was not unlike the memorable buffoon of Paris,
who, while ministering to the amusement of
thousands
,
possessing them with an infinity of fun and
frolic, was yet, at the very time, craving a
precious
mineral from the man of science to cure him
of his confirmed hypochondria. Such was the
condition of Logoochie. The idea of leaving the
old woods and the waters to which he had been
so long accustomed, and which were associated in
his memory with a thousand instances of
merriment
,
was too much for his most elastic spirits to
sustain; and the summons to depart filled him
with a nameless, and, to him, a hitherto unknown
form of terror. His organ of inhabitiveness had
undergone prodigious increase in the many
exercises
which his mind and mood had practised
upon the banks of the beautiful Branch of Sweet
Water, where his favorite home had been chosen
by a felicitous fancy. It was indeed a spot to be
loved and dwelt upon, and he who surveyed its
clear and quiet waters, sweeping pleasantly
onward
with a gentle murmur, under the high and
bending pine trees that arched over and fenced it
in, would have no wonder at its effect upon a
spirit so susceptible, amidst all his frolic, as that
of Logoochie. The order to depart made him
miserable; he could not think of doing so; and,
trembling all the while, he yet made the solemn
determination not to obey the command; but
rather to subject himself, by his refusal, to a loss
of caste, and, perhaps, even severer punishment,
should he be taken, from the other powers having
guardianship with himself, over the wandering
red men. With the determination came the
execution
of his will. He secreted himself from
those who sought him, and in the hollow of a log
lay secure, even while the hunters uttered their
conjectures and surmises under the very copse in
which he was hidden. His arts to escape were
manifold, and, unless the parties in search of him
knew intimately his practices, he could easily elude
their scrutiny by the simplest contrivances. Such,
too, was the susceptibility of his figure for
distortion
,
that even Satilla, the three eyed, the
messenger
of the Indian divinities, the most acute and
cunning among them, was not unfrequently
over-reached
and evaded by the truant Logoochie.
He too had searched for him in vain, and though
having a shrewd suspicion, as he stepped over a
pine knot lying across a path, just about dusk,
that it was something more than it seemed to be,
yet passing on without examining it, and leaving
the breathless Logoochie, for it was he, to gather
himself up, the moment his pursuer was out of
sight, and take himself off in a more secluded
direction. The back of Logoochie was, itself,
little better than a stripe of the tree bark to those
who remarked it casually. From his heel to his
head, inclusive, it looked like so many articulated
folds or scales of the pine tree, here and there
bulging out into excrescences. The back of his
head was a solid knot, for all the world like that
of the scorched pine knot, hard and resinous.
This knot ran across in front, so as to arch above
and overhang his forehead, and was crowned
with hair, that, though soft, was thick and woody
to the eye, and looked not unlike the plates of the
pine-bur when green in season. It rose into a
ridge or comb directly across the head from front
to rear, like the war tuft of a Seminole warrior.
His eyes, small and red, seemed, occasionally, to
run into one another, and twinkled so, that you
could not avoid laughing but to look upon them.
His nose was flat, and the mouth was simply an
incision across his face, reaching nigh to both his
ears, which lapped and hung over like those of a
hound. He was short in person, thick, and
strangely bow-legged; and, to complete the
uncouth
figure, his arms, shooting out from under a
high knot, that gathered like an epaulette upon
each shoulder, possessed but a single though rather
long bone, and terminated in a thick, squab,
burlike
hand, having fingers, themselves inflexible,
and but of single joints, and tipped, not with
nails, but with claws, somewhat like those of the
panther, and equally fearful in strife. Such was
the vague general outline which, now and then,
the Indian hunter, and, after him, the Georgia
squatter, caught, towards evening, of the
wandering
Logoochie, as he stole suddenly from sight
into the sheltering copse, that ran along the edges
of some wide savannah.
The brother divinities of the Creek warriors
had gone after their tribes, and Logoochie alone
remained upon the banks of the Sweet Water
Branch. He remained in spite of many reasons
for departure. The white borderer came nigher
and nigher, with every succeeding day. The
stout log-house started up in the centre of his
favorite groves, and many families, clustering
within a few miles of his favorite stream, formed
the nucleus of the flourishing little town of St.
Mary's. Still he lingered, though with a sadness
of spirit, hourly increasing, as every hour tended
more and more to circumscribe the haunts of his
playful wandering. Every day called upon him
to deplore the overthrow, by the woodman's axe,
of some well remembered tree in his
neighborhood
;
and though he strove, by an industrious
repetition of his old tricks, to prevent much of this
desolation, yet the divinities which the white man
brought with him were too potent for Logoochie.
In vain did he gnaw by night the sharp edge of
the biting steel, with which the squatter wrought
so much desolation. Alas! the white man had
an art given him by his God, by which he
smoothed out its repeated gaps, and sharpened it
readily again, or found a new one, for the
destruction
of the forest. Over and over again, did
Logoochie
think to take the trail of his people, and
leave a spot in which a petty strife of this nature
had become, though a familiar, a painful practice;
but then, as he thought of the humiliating
acknowledgment
which, by so doing, he must offer to his
brother gods, his pride came to his aid, and he
determined to remain where he was. Then again,
as he rambled along the sweet waters of the
branch, and talked pleasantly with the trees, his
old acquaintance, and looked down upon little
groups of Indians that occasionally came to visit
this or that tumulus of the buried nations, he felt
a sweet pleasure in the thought, that although all
were gone of the old possessors, and a new people
and new gods had come to sway the lands of his
outlawed race, he still should linger and watch
over, with a sacred regard, the few relics, and the
speechless trophies, which the forgotten time had
left them. He determined to remain still, as he
long had been, the presiding genius of the place.
V.
From habit, at length, it came to Logoochie to
serve, with kind offices, the white settlers, just as
he had served the red men before him. He soon
saw that, in many respects, the people dwelling in
the woods, however different their color and
origin
,
must necessarily resemble one another. They
were in some particulars equally wild and equally
simple. He soon discovered, too, that however
much they might profess indifference to the
superstitions
of the barbarous race they had superseded,
they were not a whit more secure from the
occasional
tremors which followed his own practices or
presence. More than once had he marked the
fright of the young woodman, as, looking towards
nightfall over his left shoulder, he had beheld the
funny twinkling eyes, and the long slit mouth,
receding suddenly into the bush behind him. This
assured Logoochie of the possession still, even
with a new people, of some of that power which
he had exercised upon the old; and when he saw,
too, that the character of the white man was plain,
gentle, and unobtrusive, he came, after a brief
study
,
to like him also; though, certainly, in less
degree, than his Indian predecessors. From one
step of his acquaintance with the new comers to
another, Logoochie at length began to visit, at
stolen periods, and to prowl around the little
cottage
,
of the squatter;  sometimes playing tricks
upon his household, but more frequently
employing
himself in the analysis of pursuits, and of a
character, as new almost to him as to the people
whose places they had assumed. Nor will this
seeming ignorance, on the part of Logoochie,
subtract a single jot from his high pretension as an
Indian god, since true philosophy and a
deliberate
reason, must, long since, have been aware, that
the mythological rule of every people, has been
adapted, by the superior of all, to their mental
VOL. II. 9
and physical condition; and the Great Manneyto
of the savage, in his primitive state, was,
doubtless
,
as wise a provision for him then, as, in our
time, has been the faith, which we proudly assume
to be the close correlative of the highest point of
moral liberty and social refinement.
VI.
In this way, making new discoveries daily, and
gradually becoming known himself, though
vaguely
,
to the simple cottagers around him, he
continued
to pass the time with something more of
satisfaction
than before; though still suffering pain at
every stroke of the sharp and smiting axe, as it
called up the deploring echoes of the rapidly
yielding
forest. Day and night he was busy, and he
resumed,
in extenso
, many of the playful humors,
which used to annoy the savages and compel their
homage. It is true, the acknowledgment of the
white man was essentially different from that
commonly
made by the Indians. When their
camppots
were broken, their hatchets blunted, their
bows and arrows warped, or they had suffered any
other such mischief at his hands, they solemnly
deprecated his wrath, and offered him tribute to
disarm his hostility. All that Logoochie could
extort from the borderer, was a sullen oath, in
which the tricksy spirit was identified with no less
a person than the devil, the Opitchi-Manneyto
of the southern tribes. This  as Logoochie
well knew the superior rank of that personage
with his people  he esteemed a compliment; and
its utterance was at all times sufficiently grateful
in his ears to neutralize his spleen at the moment.
In addition to this, the habit of smoking more
frequently
and freely than the Indians, so common
to the white man, contributed wonderfully to
commend
him to the favor of Logoochie. The odor
in his nostrils was savory in the extreme, and he
consequently regarded the smoker as tendering, in
this way, the deprecatory sacrifice, precisely as
the savages had done before him. So grateful,
indeed, was the oblation to his taste, that often, of
the long summer evening, would he gather himself
into a bunch, in the thick branches of the high
tree overhanging the long-house, to inhale the
reeking
fumes that were sent up by the half oblivious
woodman, as he lay reposing under its grateful
shadow.
VII.
There was one of these little cottages, which,
for this very reason, Logoochie found great delight
in visiting. It was tenanted by a sturdy old
farmer
,
named Jones, and situated on the skirts of
the St. Mary's village, about three miles from the
Branch of Sweet Water, the favorite haunt of
Logoochie. Jones had a small family
consisting
,
besides himself, of his wife, his sister  a lady
of certain age, and monstrous demure  and a
daughter, Mary Jones, as sweet a May-flower as
the eye of a good taste would ever wish to dwell
upon. She was young  only sixteen, and had
not yet learned a single one of the thousand arts,
which, in making a fine coquette, spoil usually a
fine woman. She thought purely, and freely said
all that she thought. Her old father loved her
her mother loved her, and her aunt, she loved her
too, and proved it, by doing her own, and the
scolding of all the rest, whenever the light-hearted
Mary said more in her eyes, or speech, than her
aunt's conventional sense of propriety deemed
absolutely necessary to be said. This family
Logoochie
rather loved,  whether it was because
farmer Jones did more smoking than any of the
neighbors, or his sister more scolding, or his wife
more sleeping, or his daughter more loving, we
say not, but such certainly was the fact. Mary
Jones had learned this latter art, if none other.
A tall and graceful lad in the settlement, named
Johnson, had found favor in her sight, and she
in his; and it was not long before they made the
mutual discovery. He was a fine youth, and quite
worthy of the maiden; but then he was of an
inquiring
,
roving temper, and though not yet
arrived
at manhood, frequently indulged in rambles,
rather startling, even to a people whose habit in
that respect is somewhat proverbial. He had gone
in his wanderings even into the heart of the
Okephanokee
Swamp, and strange were the wonders,
and wild the stories, which he gave of that region
of Indian fable  a region, about which they
have as many and as beautiful traditions, as any
people can furnish from the store house of its
primitive
romance. This disposition on the part
of Ned Johnson, though productive of much
disquiet
to his friends and family, they hoped to
overcome or restrain, by the proposed union with
Mary Jones  a connexion seemingly acceptable
to all parties. Mary, like most other good young
ladies, had no doubt, indeed, of her power to
control
9*
her lover in his wanderings, when once they
were man and wife; and he, like most good young
gentlemen in like cases, did not scruple to swear a
thousand times, that her love would be as a chain
about his feet, too potent to suffer him the slightest
indulgence of his rambling desires.
VIII.
So things stood, when, one day, what should
appear in the Port of St. Mary's  the Pioneer
of the Line  but a vessel  a schooner  a
brightly painted, sharp, cunning looking craft, all
the way from the eastern waters, and commanded
by one of that daring tribe of Yankees, which
will one day control the commercial world. Never
had such a craft shown its face in those waters, and
great was the excitement in consequence. The
people turned out,
en masse
,  men, women, and
children,  all gathered upon the sands at the
point to which she was approaching, and while
many stood dumb with mixed feelings of wonder
and consternation, others, more bold and elastic,
shouted with delight. Ned Johnson led this latter
class, and almost rushed into the waters to meet
the new comer, clapping his hands and screaming
like mad. Logoochie himself, from the close
hugging branches of a neighboring tree, looked
down, and wondered and trembled as he beheld
the fast rushing progress toward him of what
might be a new and more potent God. Then,
when her little cannon, ostentatiously large for the
necessity, belched forth its thunders from her side,
the joy and the terror was universal. The rude
divinity of the red men leaped down headlong
from his place of eminence, and bounded on
without
stopping, until removed from the sight and the
shouting, in the thick recesses of the neighboring
wood; while the children of the squatters taking
to their heels, went bawling and squalling back
to the village, never thinking for a moment to
reach it alive. The schooner cast her anchor,
and her captain came to land. Columbus looked
not more imposing, leaping first to the virgin soil
of the New World, than our worthy down-easter,
commencing, for the first time, a successful trade
in onions, potatoes, codfish, and crab-cider, with
the delighted Georgians of our little village. All
parties were overjoyed, and none more so than our
young lover, Master Edward Johnson. He
drank in with willing ears, and a still thirsting
appetite
,
the narrative which the Yankee captain
gave the villagers of his voyage. His long yarn,
be sure, was stuffed with wonders. The new
comer soon saw from Johnson's looks how greatly
he had won the respect and consideration of the
youthful wanderer, and, accordingly, addressed
some of his more spirited and romantic adventures
purposely to him. Poor Mary Jones beheld,
with dreadful anticipations, the voracious delight
which sparkled in the eyes of Ned as he listened
to the marvellous narrative, and had the thing
been at all possible or proper, she would have
insisted
,
for the better control of the erratic boy,
that old Parson Collins should at once do his duty,
and give her legal authority to say to her lover
obey, my dear,  stay at home, or, etc. She
went back to the village in great tribulation, and
Ned  he stayed behind with Captain Nicodemus
Doolittle, of the Smashing Nancy.
IX.
Now Nicodemus, or, as they familiarly called
him Old Nick, was a wonderfully 'cute
personage
;
and as he was rather slack of hands  was
not much of a penman or grammarian, and felt
that in his new trade he should need greatly the
assistance of one to whom the awful school
mystery
of fractions and the rule of three had, by a
kind fortune, been developed duly  he regarded
the impression which he had obviously made upon
the mind of Ned Johnson, as promising to
neutralize
,
if he could secure him, some few of his
own deficiencies. To this end, therefore, he
particularly
addressed himself, and, as might be
suspected
,
under the circumstances, he was eminently
successful. The head of the youth was soon
stuffed full of the wonders of the sea; and after a
day or two of talk, all round the subject, in which
time, by the way, the captain sold off all his
notions
,
he came point blank to the subject in the
little cabin of the schooner. Doolittle sat over
against him with a pile of papers before him,
some of which, to the uneducated down-easter, were
grievous mysteries, calling for a degree of
arithmetical
knowledge which was rather beyond his
capacity. His sales and profits  his accounts
with creditors and debtors  were to be registered,
and these required him to reconcile the provoking
cross currencies of the different states  the York
shilling, the Pennsylvania levy, the Georgia
thrip, the pickayune of Louisiana, the Carolina
fourpence  and this matter was, alone, enough
to bother him. He knew well enough how to
count the coppers on hearing them. No man
was more expert at that. But the difficulty of
bringing them into one currency on paper, called
for a more experienced accountant than our
worthy
captain; and the youth wondered to behold
the ease with which so great a person could be
bothered. Doolittle scratched his head in vain.
He crossed his right leg over his left, but still he
failed to prove his sum. He reversed the
movement
,
and the left now lay problematically of the
right. The product was very hard to find. He
took a sup of cider, and then he thought things
began to look a little clearer; but a moment after
all was cloud again, and at length the figures
absolutely seemed to run into one another. He
could stand it no longer, and slapped his hand
down, at length, with such emphasis upon the
table, as to startle the poor youth, who, all the
while, had been dreaming of plunging and
wriggling
dolphins, seen in all their gold and glitter,
three feet or less in the waters below the advancing
prow of the ship. The start which Johnson made,
at once showed the best mode to the captain of
extrication from his difficulty.
There  there, my dear boy,  take some
cider  only a little  do you good  best thing
in the world  There,  and now do run up these
figures, and see how we agree.
Ned was a clever led, and used to stand head
of his class. He unravelled the mystery in little
time  reconciled the cross-currency of the
several
sovereign states, and was rewarded by his
patron
with a hearty slap upon the shoulder, and
another cup of cider. It was not difficult after
this to agree, and half fearing that all the while
he was not doing right by Mary Jones, he dashed
his signature, in a much worse hand than he was
accustomed to write, upon a printed paper which
Doolittle thrust to him across the table.
And now, my dear boy, said the captain,
you are my secretary, and shall have best berth,
and place along with myself, in the `Smashing
Nancy.'
X.
The bargain had scarcely been struck, and the
terms well adjusted with the Yankee captain,
before
Ned Johnson began to question the propriety
of what he had done. He was not so sure that
he had not been hasty, and felt that the pain his
departure would inflict upon Mary Jones, would
certainly be as great in degree, as the pleasure
which his future adventures must bring to himself.
Still, when he looked forward to those adventures,
and remembered the thousand fine stories of
Captain
Doolittle, his dreams came back, and with
them came a due forgetfulness of the hum-drum
happiness of domestic life. The life in the woods,
indeed  as if there was life, strictly speaking, in
the eternal monotony of the pine forests, and the
drowsy hum they keep up so ceaselessly.
Woodchopping
,
too, was his aversion, and when he
reflected
upon the acknowledged superiority of his
own over all the minds about him, he felt that his
destiny called upon him for better things, and a
more elevated employment. He gradually began
to think of Mary Jones, as of one of those
influences
which had substracted somewhat from the
nature and legitimate exercises of his own genius;
and whose claims, therefore, if acknowledged by
him, as she required, must only be acknowledged
at the expense and sacrifice of the higher pursuits
and purposes for which the discriminating
Providence
had designed him. The youth's head was
fairly turned by his ambitious yearnings, and it
was strange how sublimely metaphysical his
musings
now made him. He began to analyze
closely
the question, since made a standing one among
the phrenologists, as to how far particular heads
were intended for particular pursuits. General
principles
were soon applied to special developments in
his own case, and he came to the conclusion, just as
he placed his feet upon the threshold of Father
Jones's cottage, that he should be contending with
the aim of fate, and the original design of the
Deity in his own creation, if he did not go with
Captain Nicodemus Doolittle, of the Smashing
Nancy.
XI.
Ahem! Mary  said Ned, finding the little
girl conveniently alone, half sorrowful, and
turning
the whizzing spinning wheel.
Ahem, Mary  ahem  and as he brought
forth the not very intelligible introduction, his eye
had in it a vague indeterminateness that looked
like confusion, though, truth to speak, his head
was high and confident enough.
Well, Ned
Ahem! ah, Mary, what did you think of the
beautiful vessel. Was n't she fine, eh?
Very  very fine, Ned, though she was so
large, and, when the great gun was fired, my
heart beat so  I was so frightened, Ned  that I
was.
Frightened  why what frightened you,
Mary
,
exclaimed Ned proudly  that was grand,
VOL. II. 10
and as soon as we get to sea, I shall shoot it off
myself.
Get to sea  why, Ned  get to sea. Oh,
dear, why  what do you mean? and the
bewildered
girl, half conscious only, yet doubting
her senses, now left the wheel, and came toward
the contracted secretary of Captain Doolittle.
Yes, get to sea, Mary. What! don't you
know I'm going with the captain clear away to
New York?
Now, how should she know, poor girl? He
knew that she was ignorant; but as he did not feel
satisfied of the propriety of what he had done,
his phraseology had assumed a somewhat indirect
and distorted complexion.
You going with the Yankee, Ned  you don't
say.
Yes, but I do  and what if he is a Yankee,
and sells notions  I'm sure, there's no harm in
that; he's a main smart fellow, Mary, and such
wonderful things as he has seen, it would make
your hair stand on end to hear him. I'll see them
too, Mary, and then tell you.
Oh, Ned,  you're only joking now  you
don't mean it, Ned  you only say so to tease me
Isn't it so, Ned  say it is  say yes, dear
Ned, only say yes.
And the poor girl caught his arm, with all the
confiding warmth of an innocent heart, and as the
tears gathered slowly, into big drops, in her eyes,
and they were turned appealingly up to his, the
heart of the wanderer smote him for the pain it
had inflicted upon one so gentle. In that moment,
he felt that he would have given the world to get
off from his bargain with the captain; but this
mood lasted not long. His active imagination,
provoking a curious thirst after the unknown; and
his pride, which suggested the weakness of a
vacillating purpose, all turned and stimulated him
to resist and refuse the prayer of the conciliating
affection, then beginning to act within him in
rebuke
.
Speaking through his teeth, as if he
dreaded
that he should want firmness, he resolutely
reiterated what he had said; and, while the sad
girl listened, silently, as one thunder struck, he
went on to give a glowing description of the
wonderful discoveries in store for him during the
proposed voyage. Mary sunk back upon her stool,
and the spinning wheel went faster than ever; but
never in her life had she broken so many tissues.
He did his best at consolation, but the true
hearted
girl, though she did not the less suffer as he
pleaded, at least forbore all complaint. The thing
seemed irrevocable, and so she resigned herself,
like a true woman, to the imperious necessity.
Ned, after a while, adjusted his plaited straw to
his cranium, and sallied forth with a due
importance
in his strut, but with a swelling something
at his heart, which he tried in vain to quiet.
XII.
And what of poor Mary  the disconsolate, the
deserted and denied of love. She said nothing,
ate her dinner in silence, and then putting on her
bonnet, prepared to sally forth in a solitary
ramble
.
What ails it, child, said old Jones, with a
rough tenderness of manner.
Where going, baby? asked her mother, half
asleep.
Out again, Mary Jones  out again,
vociferously
shouted the antique aunt, who did all the
family scolding.
The little girl answered them all meekly,
without
the slightest show of impatience, and
proceeded
on her walk.
The Branch of Sweet Water, now known
by this name to all the villagers of St. Mary's,
was then, as it was supposed to be his favorite
place of abode, commonly styled, The Branch
of Logoochie. The Indians  such stragglers
as either lingered behind their tribes, or
occasionally
visited the old scenes of their home,  had
made the white settlers somewhat acquainted with
the character, and the supposed presence of that
playful God, in the region thus assigned him;
and though not altogether assured of the idleness
of the superstition, the young and innocent Mary
Jones had no apprehensions of his power. She,
indeed, had no reason for fear, for Logoochie had
set her down, long before, as one of his favorites.
He had done her many little services, of which
she was unaware, nor was she the only member of
her family indebted to his ministering good will.
He loved them all  all but the scold, and many
of the annoyances to which the old maid was
subject
,
arose from this antipathy of Logoochie. But
to return.
It was in great tribulation that Mary set out for
her usual ramble along the banks of the Sweet
Water. Heretofore most of her walks in that
quarter had been made in company with her lover.
Here, perched in some sheltering oak, or safely
doubled up behind some swollen pine, the playful
Logoochie, himself unseen, a thousand times
looked
upon the two lovers, as, with linked arms, and
10*
spirits maintaining, as it appeared, a perfect
unison
,
they walked in the shade during the summer
afternoon. Though sportive and mischievous,
such sights were pleasant to one who dwelt alone;
and there were many occasions, when, their love
first ripening into expression, he would divert from
their path, by some little adroit art or
management
of his own, the obtrusive and
unsympathising
woodman, who might otherwise have spoiled
the sport which he could not be permitted to share.
Under his unknown sanction and service,
therefore
,
the youthful pair had found love a rapture,
until, at length, poor Mary had learned to regard
it as a necessary too. She knew the necessity
from the privation, as she now rambled alone; her
wandering lover meanwhile improving his
knowledge
by some additional chit-chat, on matters and
things in general, with the captain, with whom he
had that day dined heartily on codfish and
potatoes
,
a new dish to young Johnson, which gave
him an additional idea of the vast resources of the
sea.
XIII.
Mary Jones at length trod the banks of the
Sweet Water, and footing it along the old
pathway
to where the rivulet narrowed, she stood
under the gigantic tree which threw its sheltering
and concealing arms completely across the stream.
With an old habit, rather than a desire for its
refreshment
,
she took the gourd from the limb whence
it depended,
pro bono publico
, over the water, and
scooping up a draught of the innocent beverage,
she proceeded to drink, when, just as she carried
the vessel to her lips, a deep moan assailed her
ears, as from one in pain, and at a little distance.
She looked up, and the moan was repeated, and
with increased fervency. She saw nothing,
however
,
and somewhat startled, was about to turn
quickly on her way homeward, when a third and
more distinct repetition of the moan appealed so
strongly to her natural sense of duty, that she
could stand it no longer; and with the noblest of
all kinds of courage, for such is the courage of
humanity, she hastily tripped over the log which
ran across the stream, and proceeded in the
direction
from whence the sounds had issued. A few
paces brought her in sight of the sufferer, who
was no other than our solitary acquaintance,
Logoochie
.
He lay upon the grass, doubled now
into a knot, and now stretching and writhing
himself
about in agony. His whole appearance
indicated
suffering, and there was nothing equivocal
in the expression of his moanings. The
astonishment
,
not to say fright, of the little cottage maiden,
may readily be conjectured. She saw, for the
first time, the hideous and uncouth outline of his
person  the ludicrous combination of feature in
his face. She had heard of Logoochie, vaguely;
and without giving much, if any credence, to the
mysterious tales related by the credulous woodman,
returning home at evening, of his encounter in the
forest with its pine-bodied divinity;  and now,
as she herself looked down upon the suffering and
moaning monster, it would be difficult to say,
whether curiosity or fear was the most active
principle
in her bosom. He saw her approach, and
he half moved to rise and fly; but a sudden pang,
as it seemed, brought him back to a due sense of
the evil from which he was suffering, and, looking
towards the maiden with a mingled expression of
good humor and pain in his countenance, he
seemed
to implore her assistance. The poor girl did
not exactly know what to do, or what to
conjecture
.
What sort of monster was it before her.
What queer, distorted, uncouth limbs  what
eyes, that twinkled and danced into one another
and what a mouth. She was stupified for a
moment, until he spoke, and, stranger still, in a
language that she understood. And what a
musical
voice,  how sweetly did the words roll forth,
and how soothingly, yet earnestly, did they strike
upon her ear. Language is indeed a god, and
powerful before all the rest. His words told her
all his misfortunes, and the tones were all-sufficient
to inspire confidence in one even more suspicious
than our innocent cottager. Besides, humanity
was a principle in her heart, while fear was only
an emotion, and she did not scruple, where the two
conflicted, after the pause for reflection of a
moment
,
to determine in favor of the former. She
approached Logoochie  she approached him,
firmly determined in her purpose, but trembling
all the while. As she drew nigh, the gentle
monster
stretched himself out at length, patiently
extending
one foot towards her, and raising it in
such a manner as to indicate the place which
afflicted
him. She could scarce forbear laughing,
when she looked closely upon the strange feet.
They seemed covered with bark, like that of the
small leafed pine tree; but as she stooped, to her
great surprise, the coating of his sole flew wide
as if upon a hinge, showing below it a skin as
soft, and white, and tender, seemingly, as her
own. There, in the centre of the hollow, lay the
cause of his suffering. A poisonous thorn had
penetrated, almost to the head, as he had
suddenly
leaped from the tree, the day before, upon the
gun being fired from the Smashing Nancy.
The spot around it was greatly inflamed, and
Logoochie
,
since the accident, had vainly striven, in
every possible way, to rid himself of the intruder.
His short, inflexible arms, had failed so to reach
it as to make his fingers available; and then,
having claws rather than nails, he could scarce
have done any thing for his own relief, even
could they have reached it. He now felt
the evil of his isolation, and the danger of his
seclusion from his brother divinities. His case
was one, indeed, of severe bachelorism; and,
doubtless, had his condition been less than that of
a deity, the approach of Mary Jones to his aid,
at such a moment, would have produced a
decided
revolution in his domestic economy. Still
trembling, the maiden bent herself down to the
task, and with a fine courage, that did not allow
his uncouth limbs to scare, or his wild and
monstrous
features to deter, she applied her own small
fingers to the foot, and carefully grappling the
head of the wounding thorn with her nails, with
a successful effort, she drew it forth, and rid him
of his encumbrance. The wood-god leaped to
his feet, threw a dozen antics in the air, to the
great terror of Mary, then running a little way
into the forest, soon returned with a handful of
fresh leaves, which he bruised between his fingers,
and applied to the irritated and wounded foot.
He was well in a moment after, and pointing the
astonished Mary to the bush from which he had
taken the anointing leaves, thus made her
acquainted
with one item in the history of Indian
pharmacy
.
XIV.
The daughter of the white clay  she has
come to Logoochie,  to Logoochie when he was
suffering.
She is a good daughter to Logoochie, and
the green spirits who dwell in the forest, they love,
and will honor her.
They will throw down the leaves before her,
they will spread the branches above her, they will
hum a sweet song in the tree top, when she walks
underneath it.
They will watch beside her, as she sleeps in
the shade, in the warm sun of the noon-day,
they will keep the flat viper, and the war rattle,
away from her ear.
They will do this in honor to Logoochie, for
they know Logoochie, and he loves the pale
daughter. She came to him in his suffering.
She drew the poison thorn from his foot
she fled not away when she saw him.
Speak,  let Logoochie hear  there is
sorrow
in the face of the pale daughter. Logoochie
would know it and serve her, for she is sweet in
the eye of Logoochie.
XV.
Thus said, or rather sung, the uncouth god, to
Mary, as, after the first emotions of his own joy
were over, he beheld the expression of
melancholy
in her countenance. Somehow, there was
something so fatherly, so gentle, and withal, so
melodious, in his language, that she soon
unbosomed
herself to him, telling him freely and in the
utmost confidence, though without any hope of
relief at his hands, the history of her lover, and
the new project for departure which he had now
got in his head. She was surprised, and pleased,
when she saw that Logoochie smiled at the
narrative
.
She was not certain, yet she had a vague
hope, that he could do something for her relief;
and her conjecture was not in vain. He spoke
Why should the grief be in the heart and the
cloud on the face of the maiden? Is not
Logoochie
to help her? He stands beside her to help.
Look, daughter of the pale clay  look! There
is power in the leaf that shall serve thee at the
bidding of Logoochie;  the bough and the
branch have a power for thy good, when
Logoochie
commands; and the little red-berry which I
now pluck from the vine hanging over thee, it is
strong with a spirit which is good in thy work,
when Logoochie has said in thy service. Lo, I
speak to the leaf, and to the bough, and to the
berry. They shall speak to the water, and one
draught from the branch of Logoochie, shall put
chains on the heart of the youth who would go
forth with the stranger.
As he spoke, he gathered the leaf, broke a bough
from an overhanging tree, and, with a red berry,
pulled from a neighboring vine, approached the
Branch of Sweet Water, and turning to the west,
muttered a wild spell of Indian power, than threw
the tributes into the rivulet. The smooth surface
VOL. II. 11
of the stream was in an instant ruffled  the
offerings
were whirled suddenly around  the waters
broke, boiled, bubbled, and parted, and in another
moment, the bough, the berry, and the leaf,
had disappeared from their sight.
XVI.
Mary Jones was not a little frightened by these
exhibitions, but she was a girl of courage, and
having once got over the dread and the novelty
of contact with a form so monstrous as that of
Logoochie, the after effort was not so great. She
witnessed the incantations of the demon without
a word, and when they were over, she simply
listened
to his farther directions, half stupified with
what she had seen, and not knowing how much of
it to believe. He bade her bring her lover, as
had been the custom with them hitherto, to the
branch, and persuade him to drink of its waters.
When she inquired into its effect, which, at length,
with much effort, she ventured to do, he bade her
be satisfied, and all would go right. Then, with
a word, which was like so much music  a word
she did not understand, but which sounded like a
parting acknowledgment,  he bounded away
into the woods, and, a moment after, was
completely
hidden from her sight.
XVII.
Poor Mary, not yet relieved from her surprise,
was still sufficiently aroused and excited to believe
there was something in it; and as she moved off
on her way home, how full of anticipation was her
thoughts  pleasant anticipation, in which her
heart took active interest, and warmed, at length,
into a strong and earnest hope. She scarcely
gave herself time to get home, and never did the
distance between Sweet Water Branch and the
cottage of her father appear so extravagantly
great. She reached it, however, at last; and there,
to her great joy, sat her lover, alongside the old
man, and giving him a glowing account, such as
he had received from the Yankee captain, of the
wonders to be met with in his coming voyage.
Old Jones listened patiently, puffing his pipe all
the while, and saying little, but now and then, by
way of commentary, uttering an ejaculatory grunt,
most commonly, of sneering disapproval.
Better stay at home, a d  d sight, Ned
Johnson
,
and follow the plough.
Ned Johnson, however, thought differently, and
it was not the farmer's grunts or growlings that
was now to change his mind. Fortunately for the
course of true love, there were other influences at
work, and the impatience of Mary Jones to try
them was evident, in the clumsiness which she
exhibited
while passing the knife under the thin crust
of the corn hoe-cake that night for supper, and
laying the thick masses of fresh butter between
the smoking and savory-smelling sides, as she
turned them apart. The evening wore, at length,
and, according to an old familiar habit, the lovers
walked forth to the haunted and fairy-like branch
of Logoochie, or the Sweet Water. It was the
last night in which they were to be together, prior
to his departure in the Smashing Nancy. That
bouncing vessel and her dexterous captain were
to depart with early morning; and it was as little
as Ned Johnson could do, to spend that night
with his sweetheart. They were both
melancholy
enough, depend upon it. She, poor girl, hoping
much, yet still fearing  for when was true love
without fear  she took his arm, hung fondly upon
it, and, without a word between them for a long
while, inclined him, as it were naturally, in the
required direction. Ned really loved her, and
was sorry enough when the thought came to him,
that this might be the last night of their
association
;
but he plucked up courage, with the
momentary
weakness, and though he spoke kindly,
yet he spoke fearlessly, and with a sanguine
temper
,
upon the prospect of the sea-adventure
before
him. Mary said little  her heart was too
full for speech, but she looked up now and then
into his eyes, and he saw, by the moonlight,
that her own glistened as with tears. He turned
away his glance as he saw it, for his heart smote
him with the reproach of her desertion.
XVIII.
They came at length to the charmed streamlet,
the Branch of the Sweet Water, to this day known
for its fascinations. The moon rose sweetly above
it, the trees coming out in her soft light, and the
scatterings of her thousand beams glancing from
the green polish of their crowding leaves. The
breeze that rose along with her was soft and
wooing
as herself; while the besprinkling fleece of the
small white clouds, clustering along the sky, and
flying from her splendors, made the scene, if
possible
,
far more fairy-like and imposing. It was a
scene for love, and the heart of Ned Johnson
11*
grew more softened than ever. His desire for
adventure grew modified; and when Mary bent
to the brooklet, and scooped up the water for him
to drink, with the water-gourd that hung from the
bough, wantoning in the breeze that loved to play
over the pleasant stream, Ned could not help
thinking
she never looked more beautiful. The water
trickled from the gourd as she handed it to him,
falling like droppings of the moonshine again into
its parent stream. You should have seen her eye
so full of hope  so full of doubt  so
beautiful
so earnest,  as he took the vessel from her
hands. For a moment he hesitated, and then how
her heart beat and her limbs trembled. But he
drank off the contents at a draught, and gave no
sign of emotion. Yet his emotions were strange
and novel. It seemed as if so much ice had gone
through his veins in that moment. He said
nothing
,
however, and dipping up a gourd full for
Mary, he hung the vessel again upon the pendant
bough, and the two moved away from the water
not, however, before the maiden caught a
glimpse, through the intervening foliage, of those
two queer, bright, little eyes of Logoochie, with
a more delightful activity than ever, dancing
gayly
into one.
XIX.
But the spell had been effectual, and a new
nature
filled the heart of him, who had heretofore
sighed vaguely for the unknown. The roving
mood had entirely departed; he was no longer a
wanderer in spirit, vexed to be denied. A soft
languor overspread his form  a weakness
gathered
and grew about his heart, and he now sighed
unconsciously. How soft, yet how full of
emphasis
,
was the pressure of Mary's hand upon his
arm as she heard that sigh; and how forcibly did
it remind the youth that she who walked beside
him was his own  his own forever. With the
thought came a sweet perspective  a long vista
rose up before his eyes, crowded with images of
repose and plenty, such as the domestic nature
likes to dream of.
Oh, Mary, I will not go with this captain
I will not. I will stay at home with you, and we
shall be married.
Thus he spoke, as the crowding thoughts, such
as we have described, came up before his fancy.
Will you  shall we? Oh, dear Edward, I
am so happy.
And the maiden blessed Logoochie, as she
uttered
her response of happy feeling.
I will, dear  but I must hide from Doolittle.
I have signed papers to go with him, and he will
be so disappointed  I must hide from him.
Why must you hide, Edward  he cannot
compel you to go, unless you please; and you
just to be married.
Edward thought she insisted somewhat
unnecessarily
upon the latter point, but he replied to
the first.
I am afraid he can. I signed papers  I
don't know what they were, for I was rash and
foolish  but they bound me to go with him, and
unless I keep out of the way, I shall have to go.
Oh, dear  why, Ned, where will you go
you must hide close,  I would not have him find
you for the world.
I reckon not. As to the hiding, I can go
where all St. Mary's can't find me; and that's in
Okephanokee.
Oh, don't go so far  it is so dangerous, for
some of the Seminoles are there!
And what if they are?  I don't care
that
for
the Seminoles. They never did me any harm,
and never will. But, I shan't go quite so far.
Bull swamp is close enough for me, and there I
can watch the `Smashing Nancy' 'till she gets
out to sea.
XX.
Having thus determined, it was not long before
Ned Johnson made himself secure in his place of
retreat, while Captain Doolittle, of the Smashing
Nancy, in great tribulation, ransacked the
village
of St. Mary's in every direction for his
articled
seaman, for such Ned Johnson had indeed
become. Doolittle deserved to lose him for the
trick which, in this respect, he had played upon
the boy. His search proved fruitless, and he was
compelled to sail at last. Ned, from the top of a
high tree on the edge of Bull swamp, watched his
departure, until the last gleam of the white sail
flitted away from the horizon; then descending,
he made his way back to St. Mary's, and it was
not long before he claimed and received the hand
of his pretty cottager in marriage. Logoochie
was never seen in the neighborhood after this
event. His accident had shown him the necessity
of keeping with his brethren, for, reasoning from
all analogy, gods must be social animals not less
than men. But, in departing, he forgot to take
the spell away which he had put upon the Sweet
Water Branch; and to this day, the stranger,
visiting St. Mary's, is warned not to drink from
the stream, unless he proposes to remain; for still,
as in the case of Ned Johnson, it binds the feet
and enfeebles the enterprise of him who partakes
of its pleasant waters.
JOCASSEE.
A story of the old-time Cherokee,
Of a true-love, that, like an angel's breath,
Hath a sweet fragrance, still surviving death,
And a bloom Time can touch not  won from high;
A flow'r  for such is true love  of the sky.
VOL. II. 12
I.
Keowee
Old Fort, as the people in that
quarter style it, is a fine antique ruin and relic of
the revolution, in the district of Pendleton, South
Carolina. The region of country in which we
find it, of itself, is highly picturesque and
interesting
.
The broad river of Keowee, which runs
through it, though comparatively small, as a
stream, in America, would put to shame, by its
size, not less than its beauty, one half of the
far-famed
and boasted rivers of Europe;  and then
the mountains, through and among which it winds
its way, embody more of beautiful situation and
romantic prospect, than art can well figure to the
eye, or language convey to the imagination. To
understand, you must see it. Words are of little
avail when the ideas overcrowd utterance; and
even vanity itself is content to be dumb in the
awe inspired by a thousand prospects, like
Niagara
,
the ideal of a god, and altogether beyond
the standards common to humanity.
It is not long since I wandered through this
interesting
region, under the guidance of my friend,
Col. G, who does the honors of society,
in that quarter, with a degree of ease and
unostentatious
simplicity, which readily makes the visiter
at home. My friend was one of those citizens to
whom one's own country is always of paramount
interest, and whose mind and memory,
accordingly
,
have been always most happily employed when
storing away and digesting into pleasing narrative
those thousand little traditions of the
genius loci
,
which give life to rocks and valleys, and people
earth with the beautiful colors and creatures of
the imagination. These, for the gratification
of the spiritual seeker, he had forever in
readiness
;
and, with him to illustrate them, it is not
surprising if the grove had a moral existence in
my thoughts, and all the waters around breathed,
and were instinct with poetry. To all his
narratives
I listened with a satisfaction which
book-stories
do not often afford me. The more he told,
the more he had to tell; for nothing staled
His infinite variety.
There may have been something in the style of
telling his stories; there was much, certainly, that
was highly attractive in his manner of doing
every thing, and this may have contributed not a
little to the success of his narratives. Perhaps,
too, my presence, upon the very scene of each
legend, may have given them a life and a
vraisemblance
they had wanted otherwise.
In this manner, rambling about from spot to
spot, I passed five weeks, without being, at any
moment, conscious of time's progress. Day after
day, we wandered forth in some new direction,
contriving always to secure, and without effort,
that pleasurable excitement of novelty, for which
the great city labors in vain, spite of her
varying
fashions, and crowding, and not always
innocent
indulgences. From forest to river, from
hill to valley, still on horseback,  for the
mountainous
character of the country forbade any more
luxurious form of travel,  we kept on our way,
always changing our ground with the night, and
our prospect with the morning. In this manner
we travelled over or round the Six Mile, and the
Glassy, and a dozen other mountains; and
sometimes
,
with a yet greater scope of adventure,
pushed off on a much longer ramble,  such as
took us to the falls of the White Water, and gave
us a glimpse of the beautiful river of Jocasse,
named sweetly after the Cherokee maiden, who
threw herself into its bosom on beholding the scalp
of her lover dangling from the neck of his
conqueror
.
The story is almost a parallel to that of
the sister of Horatius, with this difference, that
our Cherokee girl did not wait for the vengeance
of her brother, and altogether spared her
reproaches
.
I tell the story, which is pleasant and
curious, in the language of my friend, from whom
I first heard it.
II.
The Occonies and the Little Estatoees, or,
rather, the Brown Vipers and the Green Birds,
were both minor tribes of the Cherokee nation,
between whom, as was not unfrequently the case,
there sprung up a deadly enmity. The Estatoees
had their town on each side of the two creeks,
which, to this day, keep their name, and on the
eastern side of the Keowee river. The Occonies
occupied a much larger extent of territory, but it
lay on the opposite, or west side of the same river.
12*
Their differences were supposed to have arisen
from the defeat of Chatuga, a favorite leader of
the Occonies, who aimed to be made a chief of
the nation at large. The Estatoee warrior,
Toxaway
,
was successful; and as the influence of
Chatuga was considerable with his tribe, he
labored
successfully to engender in their bosoms a
bitter dislike of the Estatoees. This feeling was
made to exhibit itself on every possible occasion.
The Occonies had no word too foul by which to
describe the Estatoees. They likened them, in
familiar speech, to every thing which, in the Indian
imagination, is accounted low and contemptible.
In reference to war, they were reputed women,
in all other respects, they were compared to dogs
and vermin; and, with something of a Christian
taste and temper, they did not scruple, now and
then, to invoke the devil of their more barbarous
creed, for the eternal disquiet of their successful
neighbors, the Little Estatoees, and their great
chief, Toxaway.
In this condition of things there could not be
much harmony; and, accordingly, as if by
mutual
consent, there was but little intercourse
between
the two people. When they met, it was
either to regard one another with a cold, repulsive
distance, or else, as enemies, actively to foment
quarrel and engage in strife. But seldom, save
on national concerns, did the Estatoees cross the
Keowee to the side held by the Occonies; and
the latter, more numerous, and therefore less
reluctant
for strife than their rivals, were yet not often
found on the opposite bank of the same river.
Sometimes, however, small parties of hunters from
both tribes, rambling in one direction or another,
would pass into the enemy's territory; but this
was not frequent, and when they met, quarrel and
bloodshed were sure to mark the adventure.
But there was one young warrior of the
Estatoees
,
who did not give much heed to this
condition
of parties, and who, moved by an errant
spirit
,
and wholly insensible to fear, would not
hesitate
,
when the humor seized him, to cross the
river, making quite as free, when he did so, with
the hunting-grounds of the Occonies as they did
themselves. This sort of conduct did not please
the latter very greatly, but Nagoochie was always
so gentle, and at the same time so brave, that the
young warriors of Occony either liked or feared
him too much to throw themselves often in his
path, or labor, at any time, to arrest his
progress
.
In one of these excursion, Nagoochie made
the acquaintance of Jocasse, one of the sweetest
of the dusky daughters of Occony. He was
rambling, with bow and quiver, in pursuit of game,
as was his custom, along that beautiful enclosure,
which the whites have named after her, the
Jocass
e
valley. The circumstances under which they
met were all strange and exciting, and well
calculated
to give her a power over the young hunter,
to which the pride of the Indian does not often
suffer him to submit. It was towards evening
when Nagoochie sprung a fine buck from a hollow
of the wood along side him, and just before you
reach the ridge of rocks which hem in and form
this beautiful valley. With the first glimpse of his
prey, flew the keen shaft of Nagoochie; but,
strange to say, though renowned as a hunter, not
less than as a warrior, the arrow failed entirely,
and flew wide of the victim. Off he bounded
headlong after the fortunate buck; but though,
every now and then, getting him within range,
for the buck took the pursuit coolly,  the hunter
still most unaccountably failed to strike him.
Shaft after shaft had fallen seemingly hurtless from
his sides; and though, at frequent intervals,
suffered
to approach so nigh to the animal that he
could not but hope still for better fortune, to his
great surprise, the wary buck would dash off
when he least expected it, bounding away in some
new direction, with as much life and vigor as
ever. What to think of this, the hunter knew
not; but such repeated disappointments at length
impressed it strongly upon his mind, that the
object
he pursued was neither more nor less than an
Occony wizard, seeking to entrap him; so, with
a due feeling of superstition, and a small touch of
sectional venom aroused into action within his
heart, Nagoochie, after the manner of his people,
promised a green bird  the emblem of his tribe
in sacrifice to the tutelar divinity of Estato, if
he could only be permitted to overcome the potent
enchanter, who had thus dazzled his aim and
blunted
his arrows. He had hardly uttered this vow,
when he beheld the insolent deer mincingly
grazing
upon a beautiful tuft of long grass in the
valley
,
just below the ledge of rock upon which he
stood. Without more ado, he pressed forward to
bring him within fair range of his arrows, little
doubting, at the moment, that the Good Spirit
had heard his prayer, and had granted his desire.
But, in his hurry, leaping too hastily forward,
and with eyes fixed only upon his proposed victim,
his foot was caught by the smallest stump in the
world, and the very next moment found him
precipitated
directly over the rock and into the
valley
,
within a few paces of the deer, who made off
with the utmost composure, looking back, as he
did so, to the eyes of the wounded hunter, for all
the world as if he enjoyed the sport mightily.
Nagoochie, as he saw this, gravely concluded that
he had fallen a victim to the wiles of the Occony
wizard, and looked confidently to see half a score
of Occonies upon him, taking him at a vantage.
Like a brave warrior, however, he did not
despond
,
but determining to gather up his loins for
battle and the torture, he sought to rise and put
himself in a state of preparation. What,
however
,
was his horror, to find himself utterly unable
to move;  his leg had been broken in the fall,
and he was covered with bruises from head to foot.
Nagoochie gave himself up for lost; but he
had scarcely done so, when he heard a voice,
the sweetest, he thought, he had ever heard in his
life,  singing a wild, pleasant song, such as the
Occonies love, which, ingeniously enough,
summed
up the sundry reasons why the mouth, and
not the eyes, had been endowed with the faculty
of eating. These reasons were many, but the last
is quite enough for us. According to the song,
had the eyes, and not the mouth, been employed
for this purpose, there would soon be a famine in
the land, for of all gluttons, the eyes are the
greatest
.
Nagoochie groaned aloud, as he heard the
song, the latter portion of which completely
indicated
the cause of his present misfortune. It
was, indeed, the gluttony of the eyes which had
broken his leg. This sort of allegory the Indians
are fond of, and Jocasse knew all their legends.
Certainly, thought Nagoochie, though his leg
pained him wofully at the time,  certainly I
never heard such sweet music, and such a voice.
The singer advanced as she sung, and almost
stumbled over him.
`Who are you?' she asked timidly, neither
retreating nor advancing; and, as the wounded
man looked into her face, he blessed the Occony
wizard, by whose management he deemed his leg
to have been broken.
`Look?' was the reply of the young warrior,
throwing aside the bearskin which covered his
bosom,  `look, girl of Occony! 'tis the
totem
of a chief;' and the green bird stamped upon his
left breast, as the badge of his tribe, showed him
a warrior of Estato, and something of an enemy.
But his eyes had no enmity, and then the broken
leg! Jocasse was a gentle maiden, and her heart
melted with the condition of the warrior. She
made him a sweet promise, in very pretty
language
,
and with the very same voice, the music of
which was so delicious; and then, with the
fleetness
of a young doe, she went off to bring him
succor.
III.
Night, in the meanwhile, came on; and the
long howl of the wolf, as he looked down from
the crag, and waited for the thick darkness in
which to descend the valley, came freezingly to
the ear of Nagoochie. `Surely,' he said to
himself
,
`the girl of Occony will come back. She
has too sweet a voice not to keep her word. She
will certainly come back.' While he doubted,
he believed. Indeed, though still a very young
maiden, the eyes of Jocasse had in them a great
deal that was good for little beside, than to
persuade
,
and force conviction; and the belief in
them was pretty extensive in the circle of her
rustic
acquaintance. All people love to believe in
fine eyes, and nothing more natural than for lovers
to swear by them. Nagoochie did not swear by
those of Jocasse, but he did most religiously
believe
in them; and though the night gathered
fast, and the long howl of the wolf came close
from his crag, down into the valley, the young
hunter of the green bird did not despair of the
return of the maiden.
She did return, and the warrior was insensible.
But the motion stirred him; the lights gleamed
upon him from many torches; he opened his eyes,
and when they rested upon Jocasse, they forgot
to close again. She had brought aid enough, for
her voice was powerful as well as musical; and,
taking due care that the totem of the green bird
should be carefully concealed by the bearskin,
with which her own hands covered his bosom, she
had him lifted upon a litter, constructed of several
young saplings, which, interlaced with withes,
binding it closely together, and strewn thickly with
leaves, made a couch as soft as the wounded man
could desire. In a few hours, and the form of
Nagoochie rested beneath the roof of Attakulla,
the sire of Jocasse. She sat beside the young
hunter, and it was her hand that placed the pure
balm upon his lips, and poured into his wounds
and bruises the strong and efficacious balsam of
Indian pharmacy.
Never was nurse more careful of her charge.
Day and night she watched by him, and few were
the hours which she then required for her own
pleasure
or repose. Yet why was Jocasse so
devoted
to the stranger? She never asked herself so
VOL. II. 13
unnecessary a question; but as she was never so
well satisfied, seemingly, as when near him, the
probability is she found pleasure in her tendance.
It was fortunate for him and for her, that her
father
was not rancorous towards the people of the
Green Bird, like the rest of the Occonies. It
might have fared hard with Nagoochie otherwise.
But Attakulla was a wise old man, and a good;
and when they brought the wounded stranger to
his lodge, he freely yielded him shelter, and went
forth himself to Chinabee, the wise medicine of
the Occonies. The eyes of Nagoochie were
turned
upon the old chief, and when he heard his
name, and began to consider where he was, he
was unwilling to task the hospitality of one who
might be disposed to regard him, when known,
in an unfavorable or hostile light. Throwing
aside, therefore, the habit of circumspection, which
usually distinguishes the Indian warrior, he
uncovered
his bosom, and bade the old man look upon
the totem of his people, precisely as he had done
when his eye first met that of Jocasse.
`Thy name? What do the people of the
Green Bird call the young hunter?' asked
Attakulla
.
`They name Nagoochie among the braves of
the Estato: they will call him a chief of the
Cherokee
,
like Toxaway,' was the proud reply.
This reference was to a sore subject with the
Occonies, and perhaps it was quite as imprudent
as it certainly was in improper taste for him to
make it. But knowing where he was, excited by
fever, and having  to say much in little  but
an unfavorable opinion of Occony magnanimity,
he was more rash than reasonable. At that
moment
,
too, Jocasse had made her appearance,
and the spirit of the young warrior, desiring to
look big in her eyes, had prompted him to a fierce
speech not altogether necessary. He knew not
the generous nature of Attakulla; and when the
old man took him by the hand, spoke well of the
Green Bird, and called him his `son,' the pride of
Nagoochie was something humbled, while his
heart grew gentler than ever. His `son!' that
was the pleasant part; and as the thoughts grew
more and more active in his fevered brain, he
looked to Jocasse with such a passionate
admiration
that she sunk back with a happy smile from
the flame-glance which he set upon her. And day
after day she tended him, until the fever passed
off, and the broken limb was set and had
reknitted
,
and the bruises were all healed upon him.
Yet he lingered. He did not think himself quite
well, and she always agreed with him in opinion.
Once and again did he set off, determined not to
return, but his limb pained him, and he felt the
fever come back, whenever he thought of
Jocase
;
and so the evening found him again at the
lodge, while the fever-balm, carefully bruised in
milk, was in as great demand as ever for the
invalid
.
But the spirit of the warrior at length
grew ashamed of these weaknesses; and, with a
desperate effort, for which he gave himself no
little
credit, he completed his determination to depart
with the coming of the new moon. But even this
decision was only effected by compromise. Love
settled the affair with conscience, after his own
fashion
,
and under his direction, following the dusky
maiden into the little grove that stood beside the
cottage, Nagoochie claimed her to fill the lodge
of a young warrior of the Green Bird. She
broke the wand which he presented her, and
seizing
upon the torch which she carried, he buried it
in the bosom of a neighboring brook, and thus,
after their simple forest ceremonial, Jocasse
became
the betrothed of Nagoochie.
IV.
But we must keep this secret to ourselves, for
as yet it remained unknown to Attakulla, and the
time could not come for its revealment until the
young warrior had gone home to his people.
Jocass
e
was not so sure that all parties would be so
ready as herself to sanction her proceeding. Of
her father's willingness, she had no question, for
she knew his good nature and good sense; but
she had a brother of whom she had many fears
and misgivings. He was away, on a great hunt
of the young men, up at Charashilactay, or the
falls of the White Water, as we call it to this day
a beautiful cascade of nearly forty feet, the
water of which is of a milky complexion. How
she longed, yet how she dreaded, to see that
brother
?
He was a fierce, impetuous, sanguinary
youth, who, to these characteristics, added another
still more distasteful to Jocasse;  there was not
a man among all the Occonies who so hated the
people of the Green Bird as Cheochee. What
hopes, or rather what fears, were in the bosom of
that maiden!
But he came not. Day after day they
looked
13*
for his return, and yet he came not; but in his
place a runner, with a bearded stick, a stick
covered
with slips of skin, torn from the body of a wolf.
The runner passed by the lodge of Attakulla, and
all its inmates were aroused by the intelligence he
brought. A wolf-hunt was commanded by
Moitoy
,
the great war-chief or generalissimo of the
Cherokee nation, to take place,
instanter
, at
Charashilactay
,
where an immense body of wolves had
herded together, and had become troublesome
neighbors. Old and young, who had either
taste for the adventure, or curiosity to behold it,
at once set off upon the summons; and Attakulla,
old as he was, and Nagoochie, whose own great
prowess in hunting had made it a passion,
determined
readily upon the journey. Jocasse, too,
joined the company,  for the maidens of
Cherokee
were bold spirits, as well as beautiful, and
loved to ramble, particularly when, as in the
present
instance, they went in company with their
lovers. Lodge after lodge, as they pursued their
way, poured forth its inmates, who joined them in
their progress, until the company had swollen into
a goodly caravan, full of life, anxious for sport,
and carrying, as is the fashion among the Indians,
provisions of smoked venison and parched grain,
in plenty, for many days.
They came, at length, to the swelling hills,
the long narrow valleys of the Keochee, and its
tribute river of Toxaway, named after that great
chief of the Little Estatoees, of whom we have
already heard something. At one and the same
moment, they beheld the white waters of
Charashilactay
,
plunging over the precipice, and the
hundred lodges of the Cherokee hunters. There
they had gathered  the warriors and their
women
twenty different tribes of the same great
nation being represented on the ground; each
tribe having its own cluster of cabins, and rising
up in the midst of each, the long pole on which
hung the peculiar emblem of the clan. It was
not long before Nagoochie marshalled himself
along with his brother Estatoees  who had
counted
him lost  under the beautiful green bird of
his tribe, which waved about in the wind, over the
heads of their small community.
The number of warriors representing the
Estato
in that great hunt was inconsiderable  but
fourteen  and the accession, therefore, of so
promising a brave as Nagoochie was no small
matter. They shouted with joy at his coming,
and danced gladly in the ring between the lodges
the young women, in proper taste, and with
due spirit, hailing, with a sweet song, the return
of so handsome a youth, and one yet unmarried.
Over against the lodges of the Estatoees, lay
the more imposing encampment of the rival
Occonies
,
who turned out strongly, as it happened, on
this occasion. They were more numerous than
any other of the assembled tribes, as the hunt was
to take place on a portion of their own territory.
Conscious of their superiority, they had not, you
may be sure, forborne any of the thousand sneers
and sarcasms which they were never at a loss to
find when they spoke of the Green Bird warriors;
and of all their clan, none was so bitter, so
uncompromising
,
generally, in look, speech, and
action
,
as Cheochee, the fierce brother of the
beautiful
Jocasse. Scorn was in his eye, and sarcasm
on his lips, when he heard the rejoicings made by
the Estatoees on the return of the long-lost hunter.
`Now wherefore screams the painted bird
to-day
?
why makes he a loud cry in the ears of the
brown viper that can strike?' he exclaimed
contemptuously
yet fiercely.
It was Jocasse that spoke in reply to her
brother
,
with the quickness of woman's feeling, which
they wrong greatly who hold it subservient to the
strength of woman's cunning. In her reply,
Cheochee saw the weakness of her heart.
`They scream for Nagoochie,' said the girl;
`it is joy that the young hunter comes back that
makes the green bird to sing to-day.'
`Has Jocasse taken a tongue from the green
bird, that she screams in the ears of the brown
viper? What has the girl to do with the thought
of the warrior? Let her go  go, bring drink to
Cheochee.'
Abashed and silent, she did as he commanded,
and brought meekly to the fierce brother, a gourd
filled with the brown beer which the Cherokees
love. She had nothing further to say on the
subject
of the Green Bird warrior, for whom she had
already so unwarily spoken. But her words had
not fallen unregarded upon the ears of Cheochee,
nor had the look of the fond heart which spoke
out in her glance, passed unseen by the keen eye
of that jealous brother. He had long before this
heard of the great fame of Nagoochie as a
hunter, and in his ire he was bent to surpass him.
Envy had grown into hate, when he heard that
this great reputation was that of one of the
accursed
Estatoees; and, not satisfied with the desire
to emulate, he also aimed to destroy. This
feeling
worked like so much gall in his bosom; and
when his eyes looked upon the fine form of
Nagoochie
,
and beheld its symmetry, grace, and
manhood, his desire grew into a furious passion
which made him sleepless. The old chief,
Attakulla
,
his father, told him all the story of
Nagoochie's
accident  how Jocasse had found him;
and how, in his own lodge, he had been nursed
and tended. The old man spoke approvingly of
Nagoochie; and, the better to bring about a good
feeling for her lover, Jocasse humbled herself
greatly to her brother,  anticipated his desires,
and studiously sought to serve him. But all this
failed to effect a favorable emotion in the breast
of the malignant young savage towards the young
hunter of the Green Bird. He said nothing,
however, of his feelings; but they looked out and
were alive to the sight in every feature, whenever
any reference, however small, was made to the
subject of his ire. The Indian feeling is subtlety,
and Cheochee was a warrior already named by
the old chiefs of Cherokee.
V.
The next day came the commencement of the
great hunt, and the warriors were up betimes and
active. Stations were chosen, the keepers of
which, converging to a centre, were to hem in
the wild animal on whose tracks they were going.
The wolves were known to be in a hollow of the
hills near Charashilactay, which had but one
outlet; and points of close approximation across
this outlet were the stations of honor; for,
goaded
by the hunters to this passage, and failing of
egress in any other, the wolf, it was well known,
would be then dangerous in the extreme. Well
calculated to provoke into greater activity the
jealousies
between the Occonies and the Green Birds,
was the assignment made by Moitoy, the chief, of
the more dangerous of these stations to these two
clans. They now stood alongside of one
another
,
and the action of the two promised to be
joint and corresponsive. Such an appointment, in
the close encounter with the wolf, necessarily
promised
to bring the two parties into immediate
contact
;
and such was the event. As the day
advanced
,
and the hunters, contracting their circles,
brought the different bands of wolves into one,
and pressed upon them to the more obvious and
indeed the only outlet, the badges of the Green
Bird and the Brown Viper  the one consisting
of the stuffed skin and plumage of the Carolina
parrot, and the other the attenuated viper, filled
out with moss, and winding, with erect head,
around the pole, to the top of which it was stuck
were at one moment, in the indiscriminate hunt,
almost mingled over the heads of the two parties.
Such a sight was pleasant to neither, and would,
at another time, of a certainty, have brought
about a squabble. As it was, the Occonies drove
their badge-carrier from one to the other end of
their ranks, thus studiously avoiding the chance
of another collision between the viper so adored,
and the green bird so detested. The pride of the
Estatoees was exceedingly aroused at this
exhibition
of impertinence, and though a quiet people
enough, they began to think that forbearance had
been misplaced in their relations with their
presuming
and hostile neighbors. Had it not been
for Nagoochie, who had his own reasons for
suffering
yet more, the Green Birds would certainly
have plucked out the eyes of the Brown Vipers,
or tried very hard to do it; but the exhortations
to peace of the young warrior, and the near
neighborhood of the wolf, quelled any open show
of the violence they meditated; but, Indian-like,
they determined to wait for the moment of greatest
quiet, as that most fitted for taking away a few
scalps from the Occony. With a muttered curse,
and a contemptuous slap of the hand upon their
thighs, the more furious among the Estatoees
satisfied
their present anger, and then addressed
themselves more directly to the business before
them.
The wolves, goaded to desperation by the
sound of hunters strewn all over the hills around
them, were now, snapping and snarling, and with
eyes that flashed with a terrible anger, descending
the narrow gully towards the outlet held by the
two rival tribes. A united action was therefore
demanded of those who, for a long time past, had
been conscious of no feeling or movement in
common
.
But here they had no choice  no time,
indeed, to think. The fierce wolves were upon
them, doubly furious at finding the only passage
stuck full of enemies. Well and manfully did
the hunters stand and seek the encounter with the
infuriated beasts. The knife and the hatchet, that
day, in the hand of Occony and Estato, did
fearful
execution. The Brown Vipers fought nobly,
and with their ancient reputation. But the Green
Birds were the hunters, after all; and they were
now stimulated into double adventure and effort,
by an honorable ambition to make up for all
deficiencies
of number by extra valor, and the
careful
exercise of all that skill in the arts of hunting
for which they have always been the most
renowned
of the tribes of Cherokee. As, one by
one, a fearful train, the wolves wound into sight
VOL. II. 14
along this or that crag of the gully, arrow after
arrow told fearfully upon them, for there were no
marksmen like the Estatoees. Nor did they stop
at this weapon. The young Nagoochie, more
than ever prompted to such enterprise, led the
way; and dashing into the very path of the
teeth-gnashing
and claw-rending enemy, he grappled
in desperate fight the first that offered himself,
and as the wide jaws of his hairy foe opened upon
him, with a fearful plunge at his side, adroitly
leaping to the right, he thrust a pointed stick
down, deep, as far as he could send it, into the
monster's throat, then pressing back upon him,
with the rapidity of an arrow, in spite of all his
fearful writhings he pinned him to the ground,
while his knife, in a moment after, played fatally
in his heart. Another came, and in a second, his
hatchet cleft and crunched deep into the skull of
the hairy brute, leaving him senseless, without
need of a second stroke. There was no rivalling
deeds of valour so desperate as this; and with
increased
bitterness of soul did Cheochee and his
followers hate in proportion as they admired.
They saw the day close, and heard the signal
calling them to the presence of the great chief
Moitoy, conscious, though superior in numbers,
they could not at all compare in skill and success
with the long-despised, but now thoroughly-hated
Estatoees.
And still more great the vexation, still more
deadly the hate, when the prize was bestowed by
the hand of Moitoy, the great military chief of
Cherokee when, calling around him the tribes,
and carefully counting the number of their several
spoils, consisting of the skins of the wolves that
had been slain, it was found that of these the
greater number, in proportion to their force, had
fallen victims to the superior skill or superior
daring
of the people of the Green Bird. And who
had been their leader? the rambling Nagoochie
the young hunter who had broken his leg
among the crags of Occony, and, in the same
adventure, no longer considered luckless, had won
the young heart of the beautiful Jocasse.
They bore the young and successful warrior
into the centre of the ring, and before the great
Moitoy. He stood up in the presence of the
assembled
multitude, a brave and fearless, and fine
looking Cherokee. At the signal of the chief,
the young maidens gathered into a group, and
sung around him a song of compliment and
approval
,
which was just as much as to say,  `Ask,
and you shall have.' He did ask; and before
the people of the Brown Viper could so far
recover
from their surprise as to interfere, or well
comprehend the transaction, the bold Nagoochie
had led the then happy Jocasse into the presence
of Moitoy and the multitude, and had claimed the
girl of Occony to fill the green lodge of the
Estato
hunter.
VI.
That was the signal for uproar and
commotion
.
The Occonies were desperately angered,
and the fierce Cheochee, whom nothing, not even
the presence of the great war-chief, could restrain,
rushed forward, and dragging the maiden violently
from the hold of Nagoochie, hurled her backward
into the ranks of his people; then, breathing
nothing
but blood and vengeance, he confronted
him with ready knife and uplifted hatchet, defying
the young hunter, in that moment, to the fight.
`
E-cha-e-cha, e-herroecha-herro-echa-herro
,'
was the warwhoop of the Occonies; and it
gathered
them to a man around the sanguinary
young chief who uttered it. `
Echa-herro,
echa-herro
,'
he continued, leaping wildly in air with the
paroxysm of rage which had seized him,  `the
brown viper has a tooth for the green bird. The
Occony is athirst  he would drink blood from
the dog-heart of the Estato.
E-cha-e-cha-herro,
Occony
.' And again he concluded his fierce
speech with that thrilling roll of sound, which, as
the so much dreaded warwhoop, brought a death
feeling to the heart of the early pioneer, and made
the mother clasp closely, in the deep hours of the
night, the young and unconscious infant to her
bosom. But it had no such influence upon the
fearless spirit of Nagoochie. The Estato heard
him with cool composure, and though evidently
unafraid, it was yet equally evident that he was
unwilling to meet the challenger in strife. Nor
was his decision called for on the subject. The
great chief interposed, and all chance of conflict
was prevented by his intervention. In that
presence
they were compelled to keep the peace,
though both the Occonies and Little Estatoees
retired to their several lodges with fever in their
veins, and a restless desire for that collision which
Moitoy had denied them. All but Nagoochie
were vexed at this denial; and all of them
wondered
much that a warrior, so brave and daring
as he had always shown himself, should be so
backward on such an occasion. It was true, they
knew of his love for the girl of Occony; but
14*
they never dreamed of such a feeling acquiring
an influence over the hunter, of so paralyzing and
unmanly a character. Even Nagoochie himself,
as he listened to some of the speeches uttered
around him, and reflected upon the insolence of
Cheochee  even he began to wish that the affair
might go over again, that he might take the
hissing
viper by the neck. And poor Jocassee
what of her when they took her back to the
lodges? She did nothing but dream all night of
Brown Vipers and Green Birds in the thick of
battle.
VII.
The next day came the movement of the
hunters, still under the conduct of Moitoy, from
the one to the other side of the upper branch of
the Keowee river, now called the Jocasse, but
which, at that time, went by the name of Sarratay.
The various bands prepared to move with the
daylight
;
and still near, and still in sight of one
another
,
the Occonies and Estatoees took up their
line of march with the rest. The long poles of
the two, bearing the green bird of the one, and
the brown viper of the other, in the hands of their
respective bearers  stout warriors chosen for this
purpose with reference to strength and valor
waved in parallel courses, though the space
between
them was made as great as possible by the
common policy of both parties. Following the
route of the caravan, which had been formed of
the ancient men, the women and children, to whom
had been entrusted the skins taken in the hunt,
the provisions, utensils for cooking, &c. the great
body of hunters were soon in motion for other and
better hunting-grounds, several miles distant,
beyond
the river.
The Indian warriors have their own mode of
doing business, and do not often travel with the
stiff precision which marks European civilization.
Though having all one point of destination, each
hunter took his own route to gain it, and in this
manner asserted his independence. This had
been the education of the Indian boy, and this
self-reliance is one source of that spirit and
character
which will not suffer him to feel surprise in
any situation. Their way, generally, wound
along a pleasant valley, unbroken for several
miles, until you came to Big-knob, a huge crag
which completely divides it, rising formidably up
in the midst, and narrowing the valley on either
hand to a fissure, necessarily compelling a closer
march for all parties than had heretofore been
pursued. Straggling about as they had been, of
course but little order was perceptible when they
came together, in little groups, where the
mountain
forced their junction. One of the Bear tribe
found himself along side a handful of the Foxes,
and a chief of the Alligators plunged
promiscuously
into the centre of a cluster of the Turkey
tribe, whose own chief was probably doing the
proper courtesies among the Alligators. These
little crossings, however, were amusing rather than
annoying, and were, generally, productive of little
inconvenience, and no strife. But it so
happened
,
there was one exception to the accustomed
harmony. The Occonies and Estatoees, like the
rest, had broken up in small parties, and as might
have been foreseen, when they came individually
to where the crag divided the valley into two,
some took the one and some the other hand, and
it was not until one of the paths they had taken
opened into a little plain in which the woods were
bald  a sort of prairie  that a party of seven
Occonies discovered that they had among them
two of their detested rivals, the Little Estatoees.
What made the matter worse, one of these
stragglers
was the ill-fated warrior who had been
chosen to carry the badge of his tribe; and there,
high above their heads  the heads of the Brown
Vipers  floated that detestable symbol, the green
bird itself.
There was no standing that. The Brown
Vipers, as if with a common instinct, were
immediately
up in arms. They grappled the offending
stragglers without gloves. They tore the green
bird from the pole, stamped it under foot,
smeared
it in the mud, and pulling out the cone-tuft of
its head, utterly degraded it in their own as well
as in the estimation of the Estatoees. Not
content
with this, they hung the desecrated emblem
about the neck of the bearer of it, and, spite of
all their struggles, binding the arms of the two
stragglers behind their backs, the relentless Vipers
thrust the long pole which had borne the bird, in
such a manner between their alternate arms as
effectually to bind them together. In this
manner
,
amidst taunts, blows, and revilings, they were
left in the valley to get on as they might, while
their enemies, insolent enough with exultation,
proceeded to join the rest of their party.
VIII.
An hundred canoes were ready on the banks
of the river Sarratay, for the conveyance to the
opposite shore of the assembled Cherokees. And
down they came, warrior after warrior, tribe after
tribe, emblem after emblem, descending from the
crags around in various order, and hurrying all
with shouts and whoops and songs, grotesquely
leaping to the river's bank, like so many boys
just let out of school. Hilarity is, indeed, the life
of nature! Civilization refines the one at the
expense
of the other, and then it is that no human
luxury or sport, as known in society, stimulates
appetite for any length of time. We can only
laugh in the woods  society suffers but a smile,
and desperate sanctity, with the countenance of a
crow, frowns even at that.
But down, around, and gathering from every
side, they came  the tens and the twenties of the
several tribes of Cherokee. Grouped along the
banks of the river, were the boats assigned to
each. Some, already filled, were sporting in
every direction over the clear bosom of that
beautiful
water. Moitoy himself, at the head of the
tribe of Nequasse, from which he came, had
already
embarked; while the venerable Attakulla,
with Jocasse, the gentle, sat upon a little bank
in the neighborhood of the Occony boats,
awaiting
the arrival of Cheochee and his party. And
why came they not? One after another of the
several tribes had filled their boats, and were either
on the river or across it. But two clusters of
canoes yet remained, and they were those of the
rival tribes  a green bird flaunted over the one,
and a brown viper, in many folds, was twined
about the pole of the other.
There was sufficient reason why they came
not. The strife had begun;  for, when
gathering
his thirteen warriors in a little hollow at the
termination of the valley through which they came,
Nagoochie beheld the slow and painful approach
of the two stragglers upon whom the Occonies
had so practised. When he saw the green bird
the beautiful emblem of his tribe  disfigured
and defiled, there was no longer any measure or
method in his madness. There was no longer a
thought of Jocasse to keep him back; and the
feeling of ferocious indignation which filled his
bosom was the common feeling with his brother
warriors. They lay in wait for the coming of the
Occonies, down at the foot of the Yellow Hill,
where the woods gathered green and thick. They
were few  but half in number of their enemies
but they were strong in ardor, strong in justice,
and even death was preferable to a longer
endurance
of that dishonor to which they had
already
been too long subjected. They beheld the
approach of the Brown Vipers, as, one by one,
they wound out from the gap of the mountain,
with a fierce satisfaction. The two parties were
now in sight of each other, and could not mistake
the terms of their encounter. No word was spoken
between them, but each began the scalp-song of
his tribe, preparing at the same time his weapon,
and advancing to the struggle.
`The green bird has a bill,' sang the
Estatoees
;
`and he flies like an arrow to his prey.'
`The brown viper has poison and a fang,'
responded the Occonies; `and he lies under the
net for his enemy.'
`Give me to clutch the war-tuft,' cried the
leaders of each party, almost in the same breath.
`To taste the blood,' cried another.
`And make my knife laugh in the heart that
shrinks,' sung another and another.
`I will put my foot on the heart,' cried an
Occony.
`I tear away the scalp,' shouted an Estato, in
reply; while a joint chorus from the two parties,
promised
`A dog that runs, to the black spirit that
sleeps in the swamp.'
`
Echa-herro, echa-herro, echa-herro
,' was the
grand cry, or fearful warwhoop, which
announced
the moment of onset and the beginning of the
strife.
IX.
The Occonies were not backward, though the
affair was commenced by the Estatoees.
Cheochee
,
their leader, was quite as brave as
malignant
,
and now exulted in the near prospect of that
sweet revenge for all the supposed wrongs and
more certain rivalries which his tribe had suffered
from the Green Birds. Nor was this more the
feeling with him than with his tribe. Disposing
themselves, therefore, in readiness to receive the
assault, they rejoiced in the coming of a strife, in
which, having many injuries to redress, they had
the advantages, at the same time, of position and
number.
But their fighting at disadvantage was not
now a thought with the Little Estatoees. Their
VOL. II. 15
blood was up, and like all usually patient people,
once aroused, they were not so readily quieted.
Nagoochie, the warrior now, and no longer the
lover, led on the attack. You should have seen
how that brave young chief went into battle
how he leapt up in air, slapped his hands upon
his thighs in token of contempt for his foe, and
throwing himself open before his enemies, dashed
down his bow and arrows, and waving his hatchet,
signified to them his desire for the conflict,
l'outrance
,
and, what would certainly make it so, hand
to hand. The Occonies took him at his word,
and throwing aside the long bow, they bounded
out from their cover to meet their adversaries.
Then should you have seen that meeting  that
first rush  how they threw the tomahawk  how
they flourished the knife  how the brave man
rushed to the fierce embrace of his strong enemy
and how the two rolled along the hill in the
teeth-binding struggle of death.
The tomahawk of Nagoochie had wings and
a tooth. It flew and bit in every direction. One
after another, the Occonies went down before it,
and still his fierce war cry of `
Echa-mal-Occony
,'
preceding every stroke, announced another and
another victim. They sank away from him like
sheep before the wolf that is hungry, and the
disparity
of force was not so great in favor of the
Occonies, when we recollect that Nagoochie was
against them. They were now, under his fierce
valor, almost equal in number, and something
more was necessary to be done by the Occonies
before they could hope for that favorable result
from the struggle which they had before looked
upon as certain. It was for Cheochee now to
seek out and to encounter the gallant young chief
of Estato. Nagoochie, hitherto, for reasons best
known to himself, had studiously avoided the
leader of the Vipers; but he could no longer do
so. He was contending, in close strife, with
Okonettee
,
or the One Eyed  a stout warrior of the
Vipers  as Cheochee approached him. In the
next moment, the hatchet of Nagoochie entered
the skull of Okonettee. The One-Eyed sunk to
the ground, as if in supplication, and, seizing the
legs of his conqueror, in spite of the repeated
blows which descended from the deadly
instrument
,
each of which was a death, while his head
swam, and the blood filled his eyes, and his senses
were fast fleeting, he held on with a death-grasp
which nothing could compel him to forego. In
this predicament, Cheochee confronted the young
brave of Estato. The strife was short, for though
Nagoochie fought as bravely as ever, yet he
struck in vain, while the dying wretch, grappling
his legs, disordered, even by his convulsions, not
less than by his efforts, every blow which the strong
hand of Nagoochie sought to give. One arm was
already disabled, and still the dying wretch held
on to his legs. In another moment, the One-Eyed
was seized by the last spasms of death, and in his
struggles, he dragged the Estato chief to his
knees. This was the fatal disadvantage. Before
any of the Green Bird warriors could come to his
succor, the blow was given, and Nagoochie lay
under the knee of the Brown Viper. The knife
was in his heart, and the life not yet gone, when
the same instrument encircled his head, and his
swimming vision could behold his own scalp
waving
in the grasp of his conqueror. The gallant
spirit of Nagoochie passed away in a vain effort
to utter his song of death  the song of a brave
warrior conscious of many victories.
X.
Jocasse looked up to the hills when she heard
the fierce cry of the descending Vipers. Their
joy was madness, for they had fought with  they
had slain, the bravest of their enemies. The
intoxication
of tone which Cheochee exhibited, when
he told the story of the strife, and announced his
victory, went like a death-stroke to the heart of
the maiden. But she said not a word  she
uttered
no complaint  she shed no tear  but,
gliding quietly into the boat in which they were
about to cross the river, she sat silent, gazing, with
the fixedness of a marable statue, upon the still
dripping scalp of her lover, as it dangled about
the neck of his conqueror. On a sudden, just as
they had reached the middle of the stream, she
started, and her gaze was turned once more
backward
upon the banks they had left, as if, on a
sudden
,
some object of interest had met her sight,
then, whether by accident or design, with look still
intent in the same direction, she fell over the side,
before they could save or prevent her, and was
buried in the deep waters of Sarratay for ever.
She rose not once to the surface. The stream,
from that moment, lost the name of Sarratay, and
both whites and Indians, to this day, known it only
as the river of Jocasse. The girls of Cherokee,
however, contend that she did not sink, but
walking
`the waters like a thing of life,' that she
rejoined
Nagoochie, whom she saw beckoning to
her from the shore. Nor is this the only tradition.
15*
The story goes on to describe a beautiful lodge,
one of the most select in the valley of Manneyto,
the hunter of which is Nagoochie of the Green
Bird, while the maiden who dresses his venison is
certainly known as Jocasse.
THE CHEROKEE EMBASSAGE.
Where go these messengers
These untamed lords of the forest,  whither speed
Their barks o'er unknown waters  to survey
What land of blue delight, what better shore,
More grateful to the hunter than the last?
It
was deemed prudent, soon after the close of
a trying war with the savages, to conciliate the
Cherokee nation, then one of the largest in the
colony; and Sir Alexander Cumming, himself
an ostentatious person, was fitly chosen for this
purpose. Charged with proposals of alliance,
and amply provided with gifts, more imposing
than valuable, to the several leading chiefs and
sages, this gentleman, in the beginning of the
year 1730, set forth for the Apalachian
mountains
,
in the neighborhood of which the principal
towns of the Cherokees were situated. He was
attended on this occasion, as well by several
voluntary travellers, as by a numerous military
retinue; and no circumstance was omitted, of
display
or pomp, which could impress upon the
aborigines
an idea of the vast power of that foreign
potentate, whose representative was then to appear
before them. Every expense called for by the
deputation
was cheerfully conceded on the part of
the royal government, as the king well knew the
great military strength of the people, whom it was
the object to conciliate. The Cherokees inhabiting
South Carolina at this time, were as numerous as
they were brave. The inhabitants of thirty-seven
regular towns, were computed to amount to twenty
thousand. Of these, six thousand were bowmen,
ready, on any emergency, to take the field. In
addition to this force, which may be considered
the regular force of the nation, the roving tribes
were supposed to reach several thousand more;
not so easy to be brought together, but, if
possible
,
far more dangerous to an enemy when once
collected, as, from their continual habit of
wandering
,
they grew even fiercer than the wild beasts,
in whose pursuit only they seemed to live.
It was some time before Sir Alexander reached
Keowee, a distance of three hundred miles or more
from Charleston. His way, for the most part,
lay through a wilderness, seldom, if ever before,
trodden by European footsteps. It was a dreary
pilgrimage, and it was no small satisfaction to the
English, when, as they attained the outskirts of the
Cherokee territory, the chiefs of the lower town,
hearing of their approach, came forth to receive
and to guide them still further on their way.
Ee-fistoe
,
the chief of the Green Birds or Little
Estatoees
,
Chulochkolla, the sachem of the Occonies,
and Moitoy, the Black Warrior of Telliquo, the
most renowned of all their braves, thus joined the
jaded cavalcade.
Sir Alexander Cumming hailed them with a
flourish; and, having disposed of his retinue,
before
their approach, in such a manner as to show
them to the best possible advantage, he was pleased
to think that he had made a favorable impression.
He was not deceived. The wondering savages
themselves ostentatiously decorated, according
to their sylvan fashion, in all the rich plumage of
their native birds, contrasted strangely with the
hideous paint, and rugged skins, which formed so
large a part of their ceremonial equipment  were
nevertheless overcome by the more imposing
splendors
of the deputation. The glittering armor
the gorgeous uniform of the English, shining in
gold and scarlet  the lofty plumes  the plunging
and richly caparisoned horses  together with the
thrilling military music of an English band  all
combined to overpower their imaginations, and to
impress the deeply excited senses of the
Cherokees
;
and though, like the Roman Fabricius, they
were not to be surprised, and suffered neither awe
nor irreverent curiosity to appear upon their faces,
or in their gesticulation, they were all nevertheless
strongly wrought upon by both these emotions.
Sir Alexander lost no time in securing the
friendship
of the chiefs, as they severally came forth to
meet him. He received them in great state, and
to each gave some particular present, so carefully
chosen as to avoid all chance of showing a
preference
to any one, thus giving offence to the rest.
This caution had its due results. The chiefs were
all well satisfied, and Moitoy, the Black Warrior
of Telliquo, not to be outdone in these respects,
brought from Tenassee, the principal town of the
nation, the crown of the Great Keowee, the old
chief and reigning sovereign  a monarch too
potent
,
according to his own and his people's
estimation
,
to be even looked upon by strangers. The
policy of the suspicious savage had much to do
with this strange seclusion. His person, like that
of Montezuma, was considered sacred, and a
proper watch was maintained over it accordingly.
Thus, though able to have annihilated the entire
force under Cumming in a single effort, it was yet
thought advisable to risk nothing, by the exposure
of a commodity so susceptible to injury as a
reigning
VOL. II. 16
sovereign; and with the first annuciation,
therefore, of the approach of the English, Keowee,
a decrepid and almost blind old man, was hurried
bodily away from the contiguous country, more
deeply than before into the thick forests, and among
the impassable barriers of rock, which girdled in
and covered their extended territory. To Moitoy,
and the other chiefs or kings, was entrusted the
task of receiving and providing for the strangers;
and, to do them all justice, the reception was such
as became a brave and honorable people. The
fruits and flesh, the maize and provisions, to which
they were themselves accustomed, were all freely
provided; and five eagle tails, and four scalps
from slaughtered enemies, were also among the
presents brought by Moitoy. These had a
signification
which, through the interpreter, the dusky
warriors explained to the satisfaction of their
European
visiters. The feathers of the eagle marked
the strength and the glory alike of Cherokee, and
the scalp of their enemies announced the unerring
certainty of Cherokee victory and vengeance.
These were presented to the English, in token that
henceforward their course should be trodden on
the same war path, in close affinity, and against
the same enemies.
Thirty-two chiefs, each paramount with his own
tribe and section, appeared at the solemn council
which followed. A great deal of pompous talk
was uttered, and Moitoy of Telliquo, the Black
Warrior, found such high favor with Sir
Alexander
,
that he nominated him as the
commander-in-chief
of the Cherokee armies, and presented him
with a rich robe as a badge of his new office. The
chiefs present agreed to recognise him as such,
provided that there should be a like accountability
to him, (Sir Alexander,) on the part of Moitoy.
Every thing went on amicably, and, emboldened
by the friendly disposition which the savages
evinced, the English ambassador proposed that
some of them should accompany him to England,
in order, with their own eyes, to behold that great
king, of whom he had given them a most flaming
description.
Your brother, King George, said he, in a
speech which was well remembered by the
attentive
chiefs, will be glad to see you. He will
load you with presents, with hatchets and knives,
with rich clothes, and beautiful feathers. He will
bind you to his heart with a bright gold chain,
which will last unbroken for a thousand years.
He is our brother, replied the chiefs with one
voice, dazzled by the glorious promise  he is
our brother  we will go to our brother George.
There was no difficulty in getting the proposed
deputation; the only difficulty, indeed, was in
making a selection from the number of those
offering
.
Unconscious of the length of the voyage, of
its dangers, and the new and unaccustomed scenes
and circumstances through which they would have
to go before realizing the prospects set before them,
the simple savages, each a king in his own
country
,
were readily persuaded to undertake the
embassage
which promised them so much enjoyment.
The gold and the glitter  the fine armor like that
which Sir Alexander wore  the pomp and the
display, which, through the interpreter, the
Englishman
dwelt upon in the most glowing language
were irresistible; and, full of the splendors of
their brother George, they threw the bear skins
about their shoulders, filled their quivers with fresh
arrows from the canebrake, and kissing the sunny
side, one after the other, of the broad tree that
covered them during the progress of the council,
they bade their farewell to the green forests, and
the wild free country, their eyes might never again
behold.
Six of them accompanied Sir Alexander to
Charleston, and thence, having been there joined
by another chief who followed them after a brief
delay, they embarked with him for Europe. The
eldest of these chiefs, or kings, was Tonestoi,
prince of Nequasse, a once formidable, but now
decayed warrior, and a good old man. He was
renowned among the Cherokees for his wisdom.
The next in order was the famous orator,
Skiajagustha
a man whose eloquence performed
wonders
in the councils of his people, and of whose
speeches, some occur upon our own historical
records
,
not unworthy to appear in any collection.
Next came Chulockholla, another orator, neither
so old nor so well renowned as Skiajagustha. The
chief of the Occonies, or Brown Vipers, Cenestee,
was the fourth of this delegation  a chief only
remarkable for the reckless audacity of his valor.
The fifth was a gallant young warrior of the Little
Estatoees, or Green Birds, Ee-fistoe  a warrior
intelligent as valiant, and not any thing less
amiable
because of his acknowledged bravery.
Occonostota
made the sixth. He was the king of
Echotee
,
and could himself bring three hundred
warriors
into the field; but he was something of a
tyrant, and was deposed the very year after his
return
from Europe. The seventh, who joined the
deputation in Charleston, was a chief also, but
16*
his name does not appear in our history. He was
probably of no great renown.
These were the Cherokee kings, who,
consenting
to the invitation of Sir Alexander Cumming,
sailed with him in the Swallow Packet, for
London
,
some time in the month of May, 1730.
Seduced
by the glowing pictures spread before their
minds by the English agent, full of expectation,
and flushed with the promise of so many novelties,
the wild men of the woods, wrapped in their
hunter
garbs, gorgeously covered with fresh paint,
and armed to the teeth, after the fashion of their
people, fearlessly went on board the little vessel
that awaited them, and, with favoring breezes,
were soon lost to the sight of land, and plunging
steadily over the bosom of the Atlantic.
The sea  a new element to the Cherokees
exacted its dues, and it was not many hours before
the warriors grew heartily sick of their unusual
undertaking. Much would they have given to be
once more in their native forests, but they were too
brave, and too well taught in the stoical morality
of the savage, to confess to any such weakness.
They had long before learned, that, to conquer, it
is first necessary that we should bear with, our fate,
and they withstood, accordingly, as well as they
could, the storms and the tossings of the waters, in
a manner by no means discrediting their creed or
nation. They grew, in a little time, familiar with
their new abiding place, and, as the initial sickness
passed away, soon began to contemplate, with
comparative steadiness and a growing
appreciation
,
all the various objects and aspects of their
new domain.
All was strange  all was wonderful around
them. Their own complete isolation  the
absence
of the woods and wilds to which only they
had been accustomed  their initiation into a world
so new and strange, as to them was that of ocean
the singular buoyancy of their ship  the
astonishing
agility of the seamen, moving about with
ease and dexterity, where they could scarcely
maintain the most uncertain foot-hold  these were
all matters of profound astonishment and curiosity.
But these were all as nothing, after the first blush
of novelty had passed away, in comparison with
the queer tricks and uncouth antics of one of the
ship's company. This was no less than a monkey,
belonging to one of the sailors, named Jacko  a
creature of habitual trick and mimicry, continually
provoked to its exercise by some one or other of
the seamen. He ran along the ropes and rigging
in pursuit of them. He mounted the spars, and
sat in uncouth shapes in the most dangerous
places. He carried off the caps of the sailors, then
pelted them down upon those who walked the deck.
In short, nothing in the semblance of mischief was
omitted by Jacko. Tonestoi, the venerable elder
of the Indian chiefs, was absolutely ravished by
the tricks of the sportive monkey. He had no
thought for any other object than Jacko. He
watched his movements by the hour, provoked
their exercise by continual stimulating affronts, and
laughed, in despite of the grave looks of his
brother
chiefs, as immoderately as if such had been
his continual practice. Tonestoi was an ancient
chief, renowned as much for wisdom as for valor,
and he presumed upon his reputation. He
therefore
gave vent to his merriment without any fear of
losing either his own or the general respect of his
people. The other chiefs, who were all younger,
were either differently situated in rank, or were not
altogether so secure in the estimation of their
people
;
and, though equally delighted with Tonestoi,
were yet prudent enough to preserve a greater
degree
of gravity. They looked on with composure;
and, while watching closely all the sports of Jacko,
they yet forebore to take any part in the merriment.
But the old chief had no such scruples, and his
laughter was without reserve. He played with
Jacko like a child  rolled with him about the
decks  hallooed him on to all manner of mischief
clapped his hands and cheered him in his
performance
,
and then, in his own language,
pronounced
a high eulogy upon his achievements.
He called him Hickisiwackinaw, or the
warrior with a tail; and at length, when he saw
Jacko swing by his hind legs from a rope, and,
with his paws, grapple and take fast hold upon
the bushy poll of one of the sailors as he walked
beneath, he called him Toostenugga, after the
celebrated leader of the Cherokee hobgoblins
this being one of the favorite modes by which
Toostenugga, suspending himself from a tree, laid
hold of, and punished, those who offended him, as
they walked beneath. Nothing could divert the
attention of Tonestoi from the monkey. Sir
Alexander
Cumming, whose sense of dignity was
greatly outraged by such unbecoming levity, tried
his best to attract the mind of the Cherokee to
more dignified amusements; and, in his vexation,
was with difficulty restrained from tumbling Jacko
overboard, hopeless of any other means of
obtaining
his object. He made a show of anger towards
the monkey, but, upon beholding the sudden
gravity
of Tonestoi as he comprehended this design,
he thought it only wise to forbear, as it was his
policy, as well as his orders, to avoid all manner
of offence. His dernier resort then was in his
liquors, and once made acquainted with their
potency
,
the old chief, Tonestoi, was soon taught to
prefer the intoxicating cup to the antics of his more
innocent companion. Jacko, or, as he called him
to the last, Toostenugga, ceased to attract so much
of his attention, and, to the shame of all parties
be it said, the good old warrior, after this, had
scarcely a sober hour until they reached the haven
of their destination.
Their arrival in London was the signal for much
bustle and exhibition. Apart from the desire to
impose greatly on their senses by shows and
splendors
,
to which, in their wild abodes, they had never
been accustomed, the better to acquire dominion
over them, they received a thousand attentions as
the last new lions in the metropolis. Lords and
ladies thronged the hotel at which the Cherokee
kings were lodged, and the beautiful squaws of
London, as was more recently the case in our own
country, submitted joyfully to the salute of the
Indian
warriors for the sake of its novelty. Feasts
were given them in profusion  frolics conceived
on purpose to make them actors; and from the day
of their arrival to that of their departure, all was
uproar and exultation. In all these junkettings, it
need scarcely be said that our Cherokees preserved
happily their usual equanimity of character. They
were grave and composed, and behaved, for all
the world, as if they had been accustomed all their
lives to such honors and indulgences. Tonestoi,
alone, of all the deputation, gave way to the
garrulous
good humor of the aged man. He laughed
and joked freely with his visiters, and nothing gave
him such profound pleasure as when his great
cheek bones and painted lips came in contact with
the velvety skin of his lady visiters. Never had
Cherokee warrior so given way before to all the
practices, and so many of the evidences, of
la belle
passion
. So much was this the case, that his more
youthful companions began to have doubts as to
the tenacity of that superior wisdom in the ancient
chief which had been a proverb in his own
country
.
But if the general acquaintance with the
Indians
,
and their usual deportment, prevailed with
and gave satisfaction to the English nobility, their
conduct in the interview with the king completed
the merriment, and furnished a fitting climax to
the whole proceeding. Seized somewhat with the
spirit of the fashion in reference to them, and
desirous
of securing, by a proper policy, the
affections
of these people, the British monarch desired,
and determined to do them particular honor. An
especial drawing-room was appointed them, and,
in the presence of a most brilliant and imposing
assemblage, he prepared to receive his
distinguished
visiters. Sir Alexander Cumming, who
had the chiefs in charge, attempted, before going
to court, to give them certain instructions as to
their behavior in the presence of majesty; but
they either did not, or would not, understand him.
They comprehended sufficiently his object,
however
,
and the native pride of an aboriginal chief
rose in arms at his suggestion. Skiajagustha, the
orator, was the first to take fire at what seemed an
indignity. Wrapping his bear skin around him
with a majesty which George himself, in all his
career, and with the best teachers, never could
have emulated, he looked scornfully upon his
would-be tutor, while he replied:
Skiajagustha is the great mouth of Cherokee
he has stood before his nation when Keowee, the
red arrow, was there. His words are good.
The interpreter explained; but, as similar
sentiments
were uttered by nearly all the party, Sir
Alexander saw that it would not only be idle, but
most probably offensive, were he to endeavor to
teach them farther. As they approached the chair
of state, in which sat the monarch, the aged
Tonestoi
took the advance. The king rose as he
drew nigh, and came forward, extending his hand
for the usual salute, as he did so, to the
approaching
Indian. But Tonestoi, remembering his own
dignity, and what had been said to him on the
score of the relationship between them, prior to his
leaving his own country, to the great horror of the
courtiers, and of Sir Alexander Cumming in
particular
,
grasped the extended hand of the English
monarch with his own, and, giving it a squeeze
that none but a bear could well have equalled,
shook it heartily and long, exclaiming, in the few
words of courtesy which he had committed in
broken
English,
Huddye-do, Broder George  huddye-do
glad to see you  and, continuing with a smile
as he looked round upon the women  You got
plenty squaws.
The court was convulsed and shocked beyond
measure. All were astounded except the king
himself, and the savages. George, with his usual
good nature, withdrawing his hand, though with
some difficulty, from the powerful gripe of his
brother
monarch, smiled pleasantly, and, amused with
the familiarity, responded in similar style, giving
the cue to those around him. Nothing then could
exceed the hilarity with which the business of the
conference was carried on and finished. The
VOL. II. 17
kings made long speeches through the
interpreters
,
satisfactory on all sides, and a treaty of
alliance
was then and there agreed upon between
them, to be valid and binding upon the Cherokees
and English in America, as they were avowed to
be so by both parties present then in England.
We quote portions of this treaty, as it not only
presents us with much of the eloquence employed
by the several contracting parties, but also gives
us some idea of the various topics of trade and
communion
,
rendering such a treaty between people
so dissimilar essential to the mutual good. It will
be found, however, that the performance of duties
devolves much more frequently upon the Indian
than upon the white man, and that his rewards,
estimated by our standards of use and value, are
quite inadequate to the services required at their
hands. Doubtless, however, they were such as
were best calculated for the uninstructed savage.
The preamble to this treaty recites.
That whereas the six chiefs, [without naming
them, and without any reference to the chief who
unquestionably joined the embassy at Charleston,
when about to sail,] with the consent of the whole
nation of Cherokees, at a general meeting of their
nation at Nequasse, were deputed by Moitoy,
their chief warrior, to attend Sir Alexander
Cumming
to Great Britain, where they had seen the
great king George, and where Sir Alexander, by
authority from Moitoy and all the Cherokees, had
laid the crown of their nation, with the scalps of
their enemies, and feathers of glory, at his
majesty's
feet, as a pledge of their loyalty;  and
whereas the great king has instructed the lords
commissioners of trade and plantations, to inform
the Indians, that the English on all sides of the
mountains and lakes, were his people, their friends
his friends, their enemies his enemies; that he took
it kindly that the great nation of Cherokee had
sent them so far to brighten the chain of friendship
between him and them, and between his people
and their people; that the chain of friendship
between
him and the Cherokee is now like the sun,
which shines both in Britain and upon the great
mountains where they live, and equally warms the
hearts of Indians and Englishmen; that, as there
is no spot or blackness in the sun, so neither is
there any rust or foulness on this chain; and, as
the king has fastened one end to his breast, [
suiting
the action to the word, in George's best and
bluffest style,] he desired them to carry the other
end of the chain and fasten it to the breast of
Moitoy
,
of Telliquo, and to the breasts of all their
wise old men, their captains and people, never
more to be made loose or broken.
The great king and the Cherokees being thus
fastened together by a chain of friendship, he has
ordered, and it is agreed, that his children in
Carolina
do trade with the Indians, and furnish them
with all manner of goods they want, and to make
haste to build houses and plant corn from
Charleston
towards the towns of the Cherokees behind the
great mountains. [Vague enough, and, like most
treaties with the Indians, carried on through
dishonest
or imperfect interpreters, not understood by
one of the parties, and a frequent source of mischief
afterwards.] That he desires the English and
Indians may live together as children of one family
that the Cherokees be always ready to fight
against any nation, whether white men or Indians,
who shall molest or hurt the English  that the
nation of the Cherokee shall, on its part, take
care to keep the trading path clean  that there
be no blood on the path which the English tread,
even though they should be accompanied with other
people with whom the Cherokees may be at war
[what an exaction  how is it possible that the
Cherokees should have understood this charge,
or, understanding, that they should have complied
with it?]
that the Cherokees shall not suffer their
people to trade with white men of any other nation
but the English
[here is monopoly with a
vengeance
!]
nor permit, [mark this,]
nor permit
white men of any other nation to build any forts or
cabins, or plant any corn among them
, upon lands
which belong to the great king.
Such was the morality of these selfish traders.
They actually excluded the savages from the
exercise
of those wonted rites of hospitality to white
men, and to christians like themselves, (for the
French and Spaniards were contemplated by this
clause,) which the Cherokees had freely accorded
to the British, and which they must otherwise have
extended freely to all others. The treaty goes on
to provide, that, if any such attempt shall be made
by the white men of any other than the British
nation, the Cherokees must not only acquaint the
British government of the fact, but must do
whatever
he directs, in order to maintain and defend
the great king's right to the country of
Carolina
.
The treaty further provides, that if any
negroes shall run away into the woods from their
English masters, the Cherokees shall endeavor to
apprehend them, and bring them to the plantation
from whence they ran, or to the governor.
Hitherto the contract has been all on one side,
and the English king has never said Turkey,
17*
once, to his Cherokee brother; but, at this stage
of the treaty, he seems to have recollected himself,
and, accordingly, we find him promising, that,
for every slave so apprehended and brought
back, the Indian that brings him shall receive a
gun and a watch coat; and
if, by any accident
, it
shall happen that an Englishman shall kill a
Cherokee
,
[an event only possible, it seems,] the king
or chief of the nation shall first complain to the
English governor, and the man who did the harm
shall be punished by the
English laws
as if he had
killed an Englishman; and, in like manner, if any
Indian happens to kill [by any accident is entirely
wanting here] an Englishman, the Indian shall be
delivered up to the governor, to be punished by
the same English laws as if he were an
Englishman
.
This was the substance of the first treaty
between
the British and the Cherokee nation; and a
precious specimen it is, of cunning beguiling
simplicity
,
and of unfair relationship between parties
originally contracting on an equal footing of
advantage
.
The Cherokee chiefs heard it first from
the lips of George, who paused at every sentence,
and, as the interpreter explained it, clause by
clause, a nobleman presented to the expecting
chiefs a rich present of cloths or ornaments.
When the king had got through his task, he
suddenly
withdrew through a private door, glad to
escape any farther embrace from his Cherokee
brethren. The further business of the treaty was
then concluded by Alured Popple, secretary to the
lords commissioners of trade and plantations, on
the one side, and by the marks of the Indian
chiefs on the other. The secretary, at the same
time, addressed them in a speech confirming the
words of the great king whom they had just seen;
and, as a token that his heart was true and open
to the Cherokees, a belt was given the warriors,
which the king desired them to show to their
children and children's children, to confirm what
was now spoken, and to bind this agreement of
peace and friendship between the English and
the Cherokees, as long as the rivers shall run,
the mountains shall stand, or the sun shall shine.
Such was the glowing termination of the
secretary's
speech. When he had concluded, the old
chief Tonestoi gave way to Skiajagustha, the
famous
orator, who seemed to know his own claims to
reply for the rest. Gathering his robe over his
left shoulder, so as entirely to free the right arm, he
began his reply, the greater portion of which is
preserved as follows. It will be found to contain
quite as much good sense, dignity, and beauty, as
was called for by the occasion:
We are come higher from the mountains, where
there is nothing but darkness. But we are now
in a place of light. We see the great king in
you  we love you as you stand here for him.
We shall die in this thought. The crown of
Cherokee
is not like that in the tower; but, to us, they
are the same  the chain shall be carried to our
people. The great king George is the sun  he
is our father  the Cherokees are his children.
Though we are red and you are white  yet our
hearts and hands are tied together. We shall say
to our people what we have seen, and our children
shall remember it. In war we will be one with
you  your enemies shall be ours  we shall live
together as one people  we shall die together.
We are naked and poor as the worms that crawl
but you have all things. We that have nothing
must love you. We will never break the chain
that is between us. This small rope we show you
is all that we have to bind our slaves  You have
chains of iron for yours. We will catch your
slave that flies  we will bind him as strongly as
we can, and we shall take no pay when we bring
him back to you. Your people shall build near
ours in safety. The Cherokee shall hurt them
not  he shall hurt nothing that belongs to them.
Are we not children of one father  shall we not
live and die together?
Here he paused, and one of the other chiefs
coming forward at a signal from the speaker,
presented
him with a bunch of eagle feathers.
Taking
them in his hand, Skiajagustha presented them
to the secretary with these words:
This is our way of talking, which is the same
thing to us as your letters in the book to you.
These feathers, from the strong bird of Cherokee
these shall be witnesses for the truth of what I
have said.
Thus discoursing eloquently together, the
parties
contracted to their mutual satisfaction, and
however unequal were the general advantages
obtained
,
there was certainly no dissatisfaction
expressed
among them. The terms were agreed
upon without discontent or difficulty, and it will
not be premature or anticipative, in this stage of
our narration, to say, in the language of the
historian
,
Ramsay, that in consequence of this treaty,
the Cherokees, for many years after, remained in
a state of perfect friendship and peace with the
colonists, who followed their various employments
in the neighborhood of these Indians, without the
least terror or molestation.
But the nine days' wonder was now over in the
British metropolis. The Indian chiefs began to
lose their importance in the sight of their
European
brethren. Some new monster soon occupied
their place, and Sir Alexander Cumming being
now prepared to return to Carolina, and the vessel
ready to depart, they had little reluctance at
leaving
a land, where, though every kindness and
courtesy had been shown them, they had found so
few objects and features at all like or kindred with
their own. They set sail from England on the
23d September, 1730, and, under favoring aspects
of wind and weather, were soon out upon the
comprehensive
world and void of ocean.
But the second voyage was more tedious to the
chiefs than the first. That had novelty to
recommend
it  the strange mass of all objects at sea,
relieved, in the first instance, its general monotony.
But the second brought all this home to them;
and, what added to their dulness still more, was
the absence of Jacko  the monkey was no
longer
one of their fellow passengers. The sailor
who owned, had sold him, while in London, and
nothing could exceed the dissatisfaction of old
Tonestoi
,
on hearing of the circumstance. The first
thing he did on coming aboard the vessel, was to
call aloud for Toostenugga. But he called in
vain, and was with difficulty made to understand,
that his goblin acquaintance was left behind them.
He refused consolation, and chafed and almost
quarrelled with those who offered it. He drank
with Sir Alexander Cumming; but that was all, in
the way of relief or amusement, that he could be
persuaded to do. In a state of moody absence,
as soon as his fit of sea sickness was well over, he
roamed about the ship, tumbling from side to side,
and, in his own language, muttering continually
of Toostenugga. Dreadfully, indeed, did he
suffer
from blue devils, and, in this mood, shooting
with his arrows wantonly at little spots in the sails,
he soon exhausted all his quiver, as the flying
shafts would generally, after a few discharges, find
their way into the bosom of the ocean. The other,
and younger, chiefs bore the voyage with far more
philosophy than their ancient comrade; and with
that aptness which belongs to man in all
situations
,
and which we have erringly denied to the
Aborigines, they, at length, began to
accommodate
themselves to the novel employments of the
sea. Skiajagustha, the great orator himself, was
the first to set an example of this discipline. He
seized upon the ropes on one occasion, and began
to tug away lustily along with the sailors. His
companions followed him, all but old Tonestoi,
and, from a sport at first, it grew to be a common
resort for exercise among them. Sir Alexander
Cumming, however, thought such practices
unbecoming
in those who had royal blood in their
veins; but, as there was no alternative, he could
suggest no objection. To Tonestoi, alone, he
could address himself; and, as the old chief took
no part in the amusements of his companions, he
was the more ready to sit gloomily and gravely
over the lengthened glass with the Englishman.
But his ennui continued to increase, and, at length,
to the great consternation of Sir Alexander, the
poor savage grew sick, and his free habit of
drinking
only made him worse. The liquor was then
withdrawn from him; and this seemed to increase
his malady. The attack was a very severe one,
and, unhappily, but few precautions had been taken
against such an occasion. There were scarcely
any medicines on board; and even these, the old
chief, with all the fretful obstinacy of a spoiled
child, could not be persuaded to take. Day by
day he grew worse, and it now became evident to
all that the danger was alarming. The younger
chiefs assembled about him, and Sir Alexander,
with deep concern, strove, through them, to
persuade
him to the adoption of those remedies which
he proposed. He resolutely rejected all their
suggestions, and tossing about in his fever, from
side to side, he exhibited a feeble peevishness to all
around him  his own people not excepted.
Several
days passed over in this manner, and it was
evident to all that he had sunk amazingly. At
this stage of his illness, and while he was chafing
querulously with all of them, Skiajagustha
approached
him where he lay. The brow of the
orator was stern and full of rebuke, and the first
words which he uttered, in his own sweet but
solemn
and emphatic language, rivetted the
attention
of the dying warrior. He ceased to tumble
upon his couch  he ceased to chafe and chide
those about him. The appeal of Skiajagustha had
been made to his manhood  to his sense of the
dignity and the courage of a brave of Cherokee:
Shall Tonestoi go to the Manneyto with the
word of a child on his tongue? Shall he say to
the Master of Life, wherefore hast thou called me?
The brave man has another spirit when the dark
spirit wraps him.
Tonestoi  it is the word of the Cherokee
is a brave among the braves. He has taken scalps
from the light-heeled Catawba  he has taken
scalps from the cunning Shawanese  he has taken
scalps from the Creek warrior that rages  he has
taken scalps from all the enemies of Cherokee.
VOL. II. 18
He should have a song for his victories, that the
Great Manneyto shall be glad to receive him.
Achichai-me! cried Tonestoi in reply  and,
in his own language, proceeded as follows:
It is good, Skiajagustha  it is good what thou
hast spoken. But I heard not before the words of
the Great Manneyto. I hear them through thee.
He has called me  I hear him speaking in the
heart of Tonestoi  I am going to the land of
spirits  to the plum groves where my fathers
journey on the long hunt. I am not afraid to go.
The Master of Life knows I am ready.
Ha! ha! he sang a moment after
Ha! ha! I laugh at my enemies. The
Catawba
could not take the scalp  he could not
drink blood from Tonestoi. Ha! ha!
That
for
the Shawanee
that
for the
Creek
that rages
that
for all the enemies of Cherokee. The
Master
of Life only can kill, and Tonestoi is ready for
him.
Bring me arrows, Skiajagustha  bring me
arrows
,
young Ee-fistoe of the Green Birds  bring
me arrows, young braves of Cherokee  the
arrows
shall speak for my victories.
They brought him arrows at his request, and he
separated the bundles, laying each shaft by itself.
The younger chiefs curiously gathered around
him, as they well knew they were now to hear a
chronicle of his own and his country's
achievements
;
and for every arrow, he had the story of
some brave adventure  some daring deed. One
of them stood for his first battle with the
Chickasaw
,
when, yet a mere boy, he went forth with his
old father, Canonjahee, on the war path against
that subtle nation. Another arrow was made to
signify his escape from a band of roving
Shawanese
who had made him a prisoner while hunting;
a third told the affair with the Creeks, for his
bravery
in which his countrymen had made him a
chief  feather chief and arrow chief; a fourth
recounted his long personal combat with
Sarratahay
of Santee, the big boned chief from that river,
who had come up on purpose to contend with him,
at the lower town of Chinebee. Tonestoi was the
victor after a long struggle, and this he dwelt upon
the most emphatically of all his victories. And
so, with a dozen other events, he associated the
arrows. For an hour his strain proceeded, and
the Indians listened with unrelaxing attention.
Sir Alexander Cumming, apprised of the nature
of the scene, hung over the dying chief with the
deepest interest; and even the sailors, several of
them came as nigh to listen as they well might
without manifest impropriety. The old man lay
silent for some time after his song was ended. But
his chosen arrows had all been carefully gathered
up by Skiajagustha, who tied them closely
together
with the sinews of the deer. Towards
evening
the chief grew much weaker, and he
muttered
fitfully, and started every now and then like
one from sleep. When the sun was about to set,
its faint delicate light streamed through the little
aperture in the cabin just where the dying man
lay. He started and strove to raise himself up to
behold the orb now sinking like himself. But
failing
to do this, he only raised his right hand and
waved it towards the bright object which he could
not see. Skiajagustha bent towards him, and
uttered
two or three words in his own language, at
which all the other chiefs rose and bent over him.
Tonestoi gave each of them a look of recognition,
and, while muttering a brief sentence, probably one
of parting, his lower jaw suddenly dropped, then
caught up as in a spasm, then as suddenly again
relaxed and fell, never again to move. The light
grew dim in the eyes which yet opened upon the
spectators.
Skiajagustha laid the bunch of arrows upon the
breast of Tonestoi, where they remained until the
next day, when his body was committed to the
deep. They were then carefully preserved by the
survivors, as witnesses of the whole transaction,
and received as such by the people. They form
one of the tokens of Cherokee valor, and are
preserved
to this very hour, among the trophies of the
nation.
THE END.